Connecticut, session 2026, SB00477.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (76) of section 12-81 of the general statutes, any person
otherwise eligible for a 2025 grand list exemption pursuant to said
subdivision in the town of Berlin, except that such person failed to file
the required statement within the time period prescribed, shall be
regarded as having filed such statement in a timely manner if such
person files such statement not later than thirty days after the effective
date of this section and pays the late filing fee pursuant to section 12-
81k of the general statutes. Upon confirmation of the receipt of such fee
and verification of the exemption eligibility of such property, the
assessor shall approve the exemption for such property. If taxes, interest
or penalties have been paid on the property for which such exemption
is approved, the town of Berlin shall reimburse such person in an
amount equal to the amount by which such taxes, interest and penalties
exceed any taxes payable if the statement had been filed in a timely
manner.

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (7) of section 12-81 of the general
statutes and section 12-87a of the general statutes, any person otherwise
eligible for a 2025 grand list exemption pursuant to said subdivision (7)
in the town of Lebanon, except that such person failed to file the
required statement within the time period prescribed, shall be regarded
as having filed such statement in a timely manner if such person files
such statement not later than thirty days after the effective date of this
section and pays the late filing fee pursuant to section 12-87a of the
general statutes. Upon confirmation of the receipt of such fee and
verification of the exemption eligibility of such property, the assessor
shall approve the exemption for such property. If taxes, interest or
penalties have been paid on the property for which such exemption is
approved, the town of Lebanon shall reimburse such person in an
amount equal to the amount by which such taxes, interest and penalties
exceed any taxes payable if the statement had been filed in a timely
manner.
Sec. 3. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (7) of section 12-81 of the general
statutes and section 12-87a of the general statutes, any person otherwise
eligible for a 2025 grand list exemption pursuant to said subdivision in
the city of Meriden, except that such person failed to file the required
statement within the time period prescribed, shall be regarded as having
filed such statement in a timely manner if such person files such
statement not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section
and pays the late filing fee pursuant to section 12-87a of the general
statutes. Upon confirmation of the receipt of such fee and verification of
the exemption eligibility of such property, the assessor shall approve the
exemption for such property. If taxes, interest or penalties have been
paid on the property for which such exemption is approved, the city of
Meriden shall reimburse such person in an amount equal to the amount
by which such taxes, interest and penalties exceed any taxes payable if
Public Act No. 26-76 2 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
the statement had been filed in a timely manner.
Sec. 4. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (76) of section 12-81 of the general statutes, any person
otherwise eligible for a 2024 grand list exemption pursuant to said
subdivision in the city of Middletown, except that such person failed to
file the required statement within the time period prescribed, shall be
regarded as having filed such statement in a timely manner if such
person files such statement not later than thirty days after the effective
date of this section and pays the late filing fee pursuant to section 12-
81k of the general statutes. Upon confirmation of the receipt of such fee
and verification of the exemption eligibility of such property, the
assessor shall approve the exemption for such property. If taxes, interest
or penalties have been paid on the property for which such exemption
is approved, the city of Middletown shall reimburse such person in an
amount equal to the amount by which such taxes, interest and penalties
exceed any taxes payable if the statement had been filed in a timely
manner.
Sec. 5. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (7) of section 12-81 of the general
statutes and section 12-87a of the general statutes, any person otherwise
eligible for a 2025 grand list exemption pursuant to said subdivision (7)
in the city of Middletown, except that such person failed to file the
required statement within the time period prescribed, shall be regarded
as having filed such statement in a timely manner if such person files
such statement not later than thirty days after the effective date of this
section and pays the late filing fee pursuant to section 12-87a of the
general statutes. Upon confirmation of the receipt of such fee and
verification of the exemption eligibility of such property, the assessor
shall approve the exemption for such property. If taxes, interest or
penalties have been paid on the property for which such exemption is
approved, the city of Middletown shall reimburse such person in an
Public Act No. 26-76 3 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
amount equal to the amount by which such taxes, interest and penalties
exceed any taxes payable if the statement had been filed in a timely
manner.
Sec. 6. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (76) of section 12-81 of the general statutes, any person
otherwise eligible for a 2025 grand list exemption pursuant to said
subdivision in the city of Waterbury, except that such person failed to
file the required statement within the time period prescribed, shall be
regarded as having filed such statement in a timely manner if such
person files such statement not later than thirty days after the effective
date of this section and pays the late filing fee pursuant to section 12-
81k of the general statutes. Upon confirmation of the receipt of such fee
and verification of the exemption eligibility of such property, the
assessor shall approve the exemption for such property. If taxes, interest
or penalties have been paid on the property for which such exemption
is approved, the city of Waterbury shall reimburse such person in an
amount equal to the amount by which such taxes, interest and penalties
exceed any taxes payable if the statement had been filed in a timely
manner.
Sec. 7. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (7) of section 12-81 of the general
statutes and section 12-87a of the general statutes, any person otherwise
eligible for a 2025 grand list exemption pursuant to said subdivision (7)
in the town of West Hartford, except that such person failed to file the
required statement within the time period prescribed, shall be regarded
as having filed such statement in a timely manner if such person files
such statement not later than thirty days after the effective date of this
section and pays the late filing fee pursuant to section 12-87a of the
general statutes. Upon confirmation of the receipt of such fee and
verification of the exemption eligibility of such property, the assessor
shall approve the exemption for such property. If taxes, interest or
Public Act No. 26-76 4 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
penalties have been paid on the property for which such exemption is
approved, the town of West Hartford shall reimburse such person in an
amount equal to the amount by which such taxes, interest and penalties
exceed any taxes payable if the statement had been filed in a timely
manner.
Sec. 8. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
chapter 204 of the general statutes, a municipality may, by vote of its
legislative body or, in a municipality where the legislative body is a
town meeting, by vote of the board of selectmen, abate all or a portion
of the total amount of any delinquent real property taxes owed to the
municipality for the 2013 and 2014 grand lists, inclusive, on any parcel
of land that is less than six thousand square feet and has been owned
continuously under the same ownership for not less than forty-five
years.
Sec. 9. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
sections 12-55 and 12-111 of the general statutes, the acts and
proceedings of the officers and officials of the town of Wilton related to
the mailing of the notice of assessment increase for the October 1, 2025,
grand list for said town and the hearings for appeals of such assessments
conducted by the board of assessment appeals of said town are
validated.
Sec. 10. (Effective from passage) Up to $45,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by public act 26-68, to the Office of Legislative Management,
for Connecticut Academy of Science and Engineering, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be
carried forward and made available during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for the same purpose.
Sec. 11. Subsection (q) of section 36 of public act 25-168, as amended
by section 12 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is
Public Act No. 26-76 5 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(q) The sum of $210,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by [this act] section 12 of public act 26-68,
to the Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of [$210,000] $220,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in said fiscal years to provide a grant to Stamford Public
Education Foundation.
Sec. 12. Subsection (vv) of section 36 of public act 25-168, as amended
by section 12 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(vv) The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by [this act] section 12 of public act 26-68,
to the Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $500,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
[Various Grants] SERC, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be
made available in said fiscal years to provide a grant to the State
Education Resource Center for disconnected youth programming.
Sec. 13. Subsection (h) of section 46b-231 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(h) [(1) On and after July 1, 2023, the Chief Family Support Magistrate
shall receive a salary of one hundred sixty-nine thousand eight hundred
eighty dollars, and other family support magistrates shall receive an
annual salary of one hundred sixty-one thousand six hundred eighty-
two dollars.]
[(2)] (1) On and after July 1, 2024, the Chief Family Support
Public Act No. 26-76 6 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Magistrate shall receive a salary of one hundred seventy-four thousand
nine hundred seventy-six dollars, and other family support magistrates
shall receive an annual salary of one hundred sixty-six thousand five
hundred thirty-three dollars.
[(3)] (2) On and after July 1, 2025, the Chief Family Support
Magistrate shall receive a salary of one hundred eighty-one thousand
one hundred one dollars, and other family support magistrates shall
receive an annual salary of one hundred seventy-two thousand three
hundred sixty-one dollars.
(3) On and after July 1, 2026, the Chief Family Support Magistrate
shall receive a salary of one hundred eighty-eight thousand nine
hundred seventy-nine dollars, and other family support magistrates
shall receive an annual salary of one hundred seventy-nine thousand
eight hundred fifty-nine dollars.
Sec. 14. Subsection (b) of section 46b-236 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) [(1) On and after July 1, 2023, each family support referee shall
receive, for acting as a family support referee, in addition to the
retirement salary, the sum of two hundred fifty-two dollars and
expenses, including mileage, for each day a family support referee is so
engaged.]
[(2)] (1) On and after July 1, 2024, each family support referee shall
receive, for acting as a family support referee, in addition to the
retirement salary, the sum of two hundred sixty dollars and expenses,
including mileage, for each day a family support referee is so engaged.
[(3)] (2) On and after July 1, 2025, each family support referee shall
receive, for acting as a family support referee, in addition to the
retirement salary, the sum of two hundred sixty-nine dollars and
Public Act No. 26-76 7 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
expenses, including mileage, for each day a family support referee is so
engaged.
(3) On and after July 1, 2026, each family support referee shall receive,
for acting as a family support referee, in addition to the retirement
salary, the sum of two hundred eighty dollars and expenses, including
mileage, for each day a family support referee is so engaged.
Sec. 15. Subsection (a) of section 51-47 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The judges of the Superior Court, judges of the Appellate Court
and judges of the Supreme Court shall receive annually salaries as
follows:
[(1) On and after July 1, 2023, (A) the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court, two hundred thirty-three thousand five hundred twelve dollars;
(B) the Chief Court Administrator if a judge of the Supreme Court,
Appellate Court or Superior Court, two hundred twenty-four thousand
three hundred ninety dollars; (C) each associate judge of the Supreme
Court, two hundred sixteen thousand sixty-three dollars; (D) the Chief
Judge of the Appellate Court, two hundred thirteen thousand six
hundred seventy-four dollars; (E) each judge of the Appellate Court,
two hundred two thousand nine hundred fifty-seven dollars; (F) the
Deputy Chief Court Administrator if a judge of the Superior Court, one
hundred ninety-nine thousand two hundred twenty-three dollars; and
(G) each judge of the Superior Court, one hundred ninety-five thousand
one hundred sixty-seven dollars.]
[(2)] (1) On and after July 1, 2024, (A) the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court, two hundred forty thousand five hundred eighteen dollars; (B)
the Chief Court Administrator if a judge of the Supreme Court,
Appellate Court or Superior Court, two hundred thirty-one thousand
Public Act No. 26-76 8 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
one hundred twenty-one dollars; (C) each associate judge of the
Supreme Court, two hundred twenty-two thousand five hundred forty-
five dollars; (D) the Chief Judge of the Appellate Court, two hundred
twenty thousand eighty-four dollars; (E) each judge of the Appellate
Court, two hundred nine thousand forty-six dollars; (F) the Deputy
Chief Court Administrator if a judge of the Superior Court, two hundred
five thousand one hundred ninety-nine dollars; and (G) each judge of
the Superior Court, two hundred one thousand twenty-three dollars.
[(3)] (2) On and after July 1, 2025, (A) the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court, two hundred forty-eight thousand nine hundred thirty-six
dollars; (B) the Chief Court Administrator if a judge of the Supreme
Court, Appellate Court or Superior Court, two hundred thirty-nine
thousand two hundred ten dollars; (C) each associate judge of the
Supreme Court, two hundred thirty thousand three hundred thirty-four
dollars; (D) the Chief Judge of the Appellate Court, two hundred
twenty-seven thousand seven hundred eighty-six dollars; (E) each judge
of the Appellate Court, two hundred sixteen thousand three hundred
thirty-six dollars; (F) the Deputy Chief Court Administrator if a judge of
the Superior Court, two hundred twelve thousand three hundred
eighty-one dollars; and (G) each judge of the Superior Court, two
hundred eight thousand fifty-nine dollars.
(3) On and after July 1, 2026, (A) the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court, two hundred fifty-nine thousand seven hundred sixty-four
dollars; (B) the Chief Court Administrator if a judge of the Supreme
Court, Appellate Court or Superior Court, two hundred forty-nine
thousand six hundred sixteen dollars; (C) each associate judge of the
Supreme Court, two hundred forty thousand three hundred fifty-four
dollars; (D) the Chief Judge of the Appellate Court, two hundred thirty-
seven thousand six hundred ninety-five dollars; (E) each judge of the
Appellate Court, two hundred twenty-five thousand seven hundred
seventy-five dollars; (F) the Deputy Chief Court Administrator if a judge
Public Act No. 26-76 9 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
of the Superior Court, two hundred twenty-one thousand six hundred
twenty dollars; and (G) each judge of the Superior Court, two hundred
seventeen thousand one hundred nine dollars.
Sec. 16. Subsection (b) of section 51-47 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) [(1) In addition to the salary such judge is entitled to receive under
subsection (a) of this section, on and after July 1, 2023, a judge
designated as the administrative judge of the appellate system shall
receive one thousand three hundred thirty-one dollars in additional
compensation, each Superior Court judge designated as the
administrative judge of a judicial district shall receive one thousand
three hundred thirty-one dollars in additional compensation and each
Superior Court judge designated as the chief administrative judge for
facilities, administrative appeals, judicial marshal service or judge trial
referees or for the Family, Juvenile, Criminal or Civil Division of the
Superior Court shall receive one thousand three hundred thirty-one
dollars in additional compensation.]
[(2)] (1) In addition to the salary such judge is entitled to receive
under subsection (a) of this section, on and after July 1, 2024, a judge
designated as the administrative judge of the appellate system shall
receive one thousand three hundred seventy-one dollars in additional
compensation, each Superior Court judge designated as the
administrative judge of a judicial district shall receive one thousand
three hundred seventy-one dollars in additional compensation and each
Superior Court judge designated as the chief administrative judge for
facilities, administrative appeals, judicial marshal service or judge trial
referees or for the Family, Juvenile, Criminal or Civil Division of the
Superior Court shall receive one thousand three hundred seventy-one
dollars in additional compensation.
Public Act No. 26-76 10 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
[(3)] (2) In addition to the salary such judge is entitled to receive
under subsection (a) of this section, on and after July 1, 2025, a judge
designated as the administrative judge of the appellate system shall
receive one thousand four hundred nineteen dollars in additional
compensation, each Superior Court judge designated as the
administrative judge of a judicial district shall receive one thousand four
hundred nineteen dollars in additional compensation and each Superior
Court judge designated as the chief administrative judge for facilities,
administrative appeals, judicial marshal service or judge trial referees or
for the Family, Juvenile, Criminal or Civil Division of the Superior Court
shall receive one thousand four hundred nineteen dollars in additional
compensation.
(3) In addition to the salary such judge is entitled to receive under
subsection (a) of this section, on and after July 1, 2026, a judge
designated as the administrative judge of the appellate system shall
receive one thousand four hundred eighty-one dollars in additional
compensation, each Superior Court judge designated as the
administrative judge of a judicial district shall receive one thousand four
hundred eighty-one dollars in additional compensation and each
Superior Court judge designated as the chief administrative judge for
facilities, administrative appeals, judicial marshal service or judge trial
referees or for the Family, Juvenile, Criminal or Civil Division of the
Superior Court shall receive one thousand four hundred eighty-one
dollars in additional compensation.
Sec. 17. Subsection (f) of section 52-434 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(f) Each judge trial referee shall receive, for acting as a referee or as a
single auditor or committee of any court or for performing duties
assigned by the Chief Court Administrator with the approval of the
Chief Justice, for each day the judge trial referee is so engaged, in
Public Act No. 26-76 11 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
addition to the retirement salary: (1) [(A) On and after July 1, 2023, the
sum of two hundred ninety-four dollars; (B) on] (A) On and after July 1,
2024, the sum of three hundred two dollars; [and (C)] (B) on and after
July 1, 2025, the sum of three hundred twelve dollars; and (C) on and
after July 1, 2026, the sum of three hundred twenty-six dollars; and (2)
expenses, including mileage. Such amounts shall be taxed by the court
making the reference in the same manner as other court expenses.
Sec. 18. Section 12-263p of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 61 of public act 26-68, is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in sections 12-263p to 12-263x, inclusive, and section 362 of
public act 26-68, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue Services;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Revenue Services;
(3) "Taxpayer" means any health care provider subject to any tax or
fee under section 12-263q or 12-263r;
(4) "Health care provider" means an individual or entity that receives
any payment or payments for health care items or services provided;
(5) "Gross receipts" means the amount received, whether in cash or in
kind, from patients, third-party payers and others for taxable health care
items or services provided by the taxpayer in the state, including
retroactive adjustments under reimbursement agreements with third-
party payers, without any deduction for any expenses of any kind;
(6) "Net revenue" means gross receipts less payer discounts, charity
care and bad debts, to the extent the taxpayer previously paid tax under
section 12-263q on the amount of such bad debts;
(7) "Payer discounts" means the difference between a health care
Public Act No. 26-76 12 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
provider's published charges and the payments received by the health
care provider from one or more health care payers for a rate or method
of payment that is different than or discounted from such published
charges. "Payer discounts" does not include charity care or bad debts;
(8) "Charity care" means free or discounted health care services
rendered by a health care provider to an individual who cannot afford
to pay for such services, including, but not limited to, health care
services provided to an uninsured patient who is not expected to pay all
or part of a health care provider's bill based on income guidelines and
other financial criteria set forth in the general statutes or in a health care
provider's charity care policies on file at the office of such provider.
"Charity care" does not include bad debts or payer discounts;
(9) "Received" means "received" or "accrued", construed according to
the method of accounting customarily employed by the taxpayer;
(10) "Hospital" means any health care facility, as defined in section
19a-630, that (A) is licensed by the Department of Public Health as a
short-term general hospital or children's general hospital; (B) is
maintained primarily for the care and treatment of patients with
disorders other than mental diseases; (C) meets the requirements for
participation in Medicare as a hospital; and (D) has in effect a utilization
review plan, applicable to all Medicaid patients, that meets the
requirements of 42 CFR 482.30, as amended from time to time, unless a
waiver has been granted by the Secretary of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services;
(11) "Inpatient hospital services" means, in accordance with federal
law, all services that are (A) ordinarily furnished in a hospital for the
care and treatment of inpatients; (B) furnished under the direction of a
physician or dentist; and (C) furnished in a hospital. "Inpatient hospital
services" does not include skilled nursing facility services and
intermediate care facility services furnished by a hospital with swing
Public Act No. 26-76 13 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
bed approval;
(12) "Inpatient" means a patient who has been admitted to a medical
institution as an inpatient on the recommendation of a physician or
dentist and who (A) receives room, board and professional services in
the institution for a twenty-four-hour period or longer, or (B) is expected
by the institution to receive room, board and professional services in the
institution for a twenty-four-hour period or longer, even if the patient
does not actually stay in the institution for a twenty-four-hour period or
longer;
(13) "Outpatient hospital services" means, in accordance with federal
law, preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative or palliative
services that are (A) furnished to an outpatient; (B) furnished by or
under the direction of a physician or dentist; and (C) furnished by a
hospital;
(14) "Outpatient" means a patient of an organized medical facility or
a distinct part of such facility, who is expected by the facility to receive,
and who does receive, professional services for less than a twenty-four-
hour period regardless of the hour of admission, whether or not a bed
is used or the patient remains in the facility past midnight;
(15) "Nursing home" means any licensed chronic and convalescent
nursing home or a rest home with nursing supervision;
(16) "Intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual
disabilities" or "intermediate care facility" means a residential facility for
persons with intellectual disability that is certified to meet the
requirements of 42 CFR 442, Subpart C, as amended from time to time,
and, in the case of a private facility, licensed pursuant to section 17a-227;
(17) "Medicare day" means a day of nursing home care service
provided to an individual who is eligible for payment, in full or with a
coinsurance requirement, under the federal Medicare program,
Public Act No. 26-76 14 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
including fee for service and managed care coverage;
(18) "Nursing home resident day" means a day of nursing home care
service provided to an individual and includes the day a resident is
admitted and any day for which the nursing home is eligible for
payment for reserving a resident's bed due to hospitalization or
temporary leave and for the date of death. For purposes of this
subdivision, a day of nursing home care service shall be the period of
time between the census-taking hour in a nursing home on two
successive calendar days. "Nursing home resident day" does not include
a Medicare day or the day a resident is discharged;
(19) "Intermediate care facility resident day" means a day of
intermediate care facility residential care provided to an individual and
includes the day a resident is admitted and any day for which the
intermediate care facility is eligible for payment for reserving a
resident's bed due to hospitalization or temporary leave and for the date
of death. For purposes of this subdivision, a day of intermediate care
facility residential care shall be the period of time between the census-
taking hour in a facility on two successive calendar days. "Intermediate
care facility resident day" does not include the day a resident is
discharged;
(20) "Medicaid" means the program operated by the Department of
Social Services pursuant to section 17b-260 and authorized by Title XIX
of the Social Security Act, as amended from time to time; [and]
(21) "Medicare" means the program operated by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with Title XVIII of the
Social Security Act, as amended from time to time; and
(22) "Health system" has the same meaning as provided in section
19a-508c.
Sec. 19. Section 12-263aa of the 2026 supplement to the general
Public Act No. 26-76 15 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
statutes, as amended by section 61 of public act 26-68, is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the state fiscal years ending June 30, 2020, through June 30,
2026, the tax imposed under section 12-263q on the provision of
inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services shall cease
to be imposed if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (1)
determines that such tax is an impermissible tax under Section 1903(w)
of the Social Security Act, as amended from time to time, or (2) does not
approve the applicable Medicaid state plan amendments necessary for
the state to receive federal financial participation under the Medicaid
program for the payments set forth in subsection (i) of section 17b-239
and subsection (c) of section 17b-239e. In the event of such a
determination or disapproval, the General Assembly shall consider,
during the next occurring regular or special session, whichever is
sooner, such amendments to the general statutes as are necessary to
comply with federal law regarding such tax.
(b) For the state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, the
taxes imposed under section 12-263q on the provision of inpatient
hospital services and outpatient hospital services as well as the
supplemental payments to hospitals set forth in subsection (c) of section
17b-239e shall revert in all respects to the structure and amounts set
forth in said sections, as they existed on June 1, 2025, if any of the
following occur: (1) The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
determines that either tax is impermissible under Section 1903(w) of the
Social Security Act, as amended from time to time, or declines to issue
any tax waiver that may be required; (2) the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services does not approve, without material modification, the
applicable Medicaid state plan amendments necessary for the state to
receive federal financial participation under the Medicaid program for
the payments set forth in subsection (c) of section 17b-239e; or (3) any
aspect of the amendments to the taxes on inpatient hospital services or
Public Act No. 26-76 16 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
outpatient services or changes to the amounts of supplemental
payments to hospitals pursuant to the provisions of this act are found to
be invalid. In the event of such a determination or disapproval, the
General Assembly shall consider, during the next occurring regular or
special session, whichever is sooner, such amendments to the general
statutes as are necessary to comply with federal law regarding such tax
and such payments. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection,
reversion to the June 1, 2025, tax and payment structure shall not be
required if the taxes on the provision of inpatient hospital services and
outpatient hospital services are permissible under federal law and the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approves state plan
amendments or other federal authorities necessary to implement
payment methodologies that, in the aggregate, produce a total state-
wide level of payments under subsection (c) of section 17b-239e that is
not materially less than the total state-wide level of payments
contemplated under this act, and that results in the combined value of
supplemental payments, disproportionate share hospital payments,
faculty practice plan payments and hospital-affiliated medical group
payments to each health system and its affiliates being as nearly
equivalent as practicable to the payment levels contemplated under this
act, with variation permitted only to the extent necessary to obtain
federal approval or comply with federal law. For purposes of this
subsection, "faculty practice plan", "hospital-affiliated medical group"
and "health system" have the same meanings as provided in section 17b-
239e.
Sec. 20. Sections 357 and 361 of public act 26-68 are repealed. (Effective
from passage)
Sec. 21. (Effective from passage) Up to $200,000 of the unexpended
balance appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by
public act 26-68, to the Auditors of Public Accounts, for Personal
Services, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June
Public Act No. 26-76 17 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for Other Expenses.
Sec. 22. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (b) of section 7-188 of the general statutes, from the effective
date of this section until December 31, 2026, any municipality with a
population of greater than twenty thousand and less than thirty
thousand, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census,
may initiate an action, including by petition signed by not less than ten
per cent of the electors of such municipality pursuant to subsection (a)
of section 7-188 of the general statutes, for the purpose of amending the
charter of such municipality, upon a majority vote of the entire
membership of the appointing authority of such municipality.
Sec. 23. Section 13 of number 467 of the special acts of 1943, as
amended by number 56 of the special acts of 1949, number 10 of the
special acts of 1957, section 2 of special act 74-29, special act 76-36,
special act 87-58, special act 89-35 and section 23 of special act 09-13, is
amended to read as follows (Effective from passage):
The board of governors of the Cornfield Point Association shall
prepare and submit a budget to said association at each annual meeting
[a budget] of the association and recommend a tax assessment [for the
purpose of and] based upon said budget, [but not to exceed five
hundred] provided no such assessment shall exceed one thousand
dollars on each lot of land having a dwelling or cottage thereon, [located
within the limits of the association, and not to exceed one] or two
hundred dollars on each vacant lot, [located within the limits of said
association,] as the same shall appear of record on October first of the
preceding year. [Said] The association shall have the power to decrease
said budget [and] or rate of tax assessment recommended by [said] the
board of governors, but in no case shall [it have the power to] the
association increase [the] such budget [and] or rate of tax assessment.
The rate of tax assessment recommended by the board of governors
Public Act No. 26-76 18 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
shall be final unless decreased by the association at such annual
meeting. The tax collector of [said] the association shall collect such tax
assessments and keep a tax record, [shall be kept and] signed by the
secretary of [said] the association, on or before the first Saturday of
October in each year. [and warrants may be issued] The tax collector
may issue a warrant for the collection of money due on [the] annual bills
[,] pursuant to the provisions of section 12-145 of the general statutes.
Such tax assessment shall be a lien upon the property upon which it
[shall be] is laid. [and such] Such lien may be continued by certificate
and shall be recorded on the land records of the town of Old Saybrook
pursuant to the provisions of the general statutes relating to continuance
of tax liens.
Sec. 24. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 2-14 of the general statutes or any other provision of the general
statutes or any special act, charter or ordinance, the request of the
Cornfield Point Association for an amendment to the association's
charter, as set forth in section 23 of this act, pursuant to the resolution
adopted by the association on June 21, 2025, and filed with the Secretary
of the State on February 10, 2026, otherwise valid except for the failure
to timely file such resolution, is validated.
Sec. 25. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 12-62 of the general statutes or any municipal charter, special act
or home rule ordinance, the city of Hartford, which is required to
implement a revaluation of real property for the assessment year
commencing October 1, 2026, pursuant to section 12-62 of the general
statutes, may defer such implementation until the assessment year
commencing October 1, 2027, provided such deferral is approved by the
legislative body of such city. The rate maker, as defined in section 12-
131 of the general statutes, may prepare new rate bills under the
provisions of chapter 204 of the general statutes to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Public Act No. 26-76 19 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(b) Any required revaluation subsequent to any deferred revaluation
implemented pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
implemented in accordance with the provisions of section 12-62 of the
general statutes. Such subsequent revaluation shall recommence at the
point in the schedule required pursuant to section 12-62 of the general
statutes that such city was following prior to such deferral.
Sec. 26. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 19a-754i of the
general statutes, as amended by section 367 of public act 26-68, is
repealed and the following is inserted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) (1) For each calendar year, beginning on January 1, 2023, the
secretary shall, if the payer or provider entity subject to the cost growth
benchmark, quality benchmarking or primary care spending target
requests a meeting, meet with such payer or provider entity to review
and validate the total medical expenses data collected pursuant to
section 19a-754h for such payer or provider entity. The secretary shall
review information provided by the payer or provider entity and, if
deemed necessary, amend findings for such payer or provider prior to
the identification of payer or provider entities that exceeded the health
care cost growth benchmark or failed to meet the primary care spending
target for the performance year as set forth in section 19a-754h. Not later
than July 1, 2028, in assessing compliance with the health care cost
growth benchmark and determining whether to identify a payer or
provider entity as exceeding such benchmark, the secretary shall use the
revised methodology adopted pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection
[(c)] (h) of section 19a-754g, and shall not identify any payer or provider
entity as exceeding such benchmark based solely on commercial
payment growth, or on commercial trends viewed in isolation. In
assessing compliance with the hospital payment growth benchmark and
in determining whether to identify a hospital as exceeding such
benchmark, the secretary shall use the hospital payment growth
Public Act No. 26-76 20 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
methodology, including consideration of the factors set forth in
subdivision (2) of this subsection, and shall not identify any hospital as
exceeding the hospital payment growth benchmark based solely on
commercial payment growth, or on commercial trends viewed in
isolation. Such assessment shall specifically consider unique
circumstances applicable to pediatric providers. The secretary shall
identify, not later than May first of such calendar year, each payer or
provider entity that exceeded the health care cost growth benchmark or
failed to meet the primary care spending target or quality benchmarks
for the performance year.
Sec. 27. Subsection (c) of section 19a-754j of the general statutes, as
amended by section 368 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) Not later than March first annually, the secretary shall notify any
payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity that exceeded the cost
growth benchmark, primary care spending target, quality benchmarks
or hospital payment growth benchmark, as applicable. Upon the request
of such payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity, including a drug
manufacturer identified as a significant contributor, the secretary shall
make available to such payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity
(1) the all-payer claims database data sets, analytic files and
methodology used to determine such benchmarks or targets, as
applicable, provided the payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity
receives approval from the all-payer claims database release committee,
(2) payment of any required fees, and (3) an executed data release
agreement for raw data to the extent permitted by law and sufficient to
enable such entity to assess, verify or challenge the secretary's
determination. The [all payer] all-payer claims database release
committee shall expedite any release requests made by an entity under
this section. Not later than January 1, 2027, the secretary shall establish
an expedited all-payer claims database data request process for payers,
Public Act No. 26-76 21 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
provider entities, hospitals and other entities identified as exceeding the
cost growth benchmark, primary care spending target or hospital
payment growth benchmark. Such process shall require the chairperson
of such release committee, or the chairperson's designee, to meet with
the secretary and approve or disapprove an application from an
identified entity not later than ten days after such meeting. Not later
than five days after any approval of an application, the secretary shall
send a data use agreement to the identified entity. Not later than ten
days after receiving an approved data use agreement from such
identified entity, the secretary shall provide the data to such identified
entity. Identified entities shall be exempt from payment of a data release
fee. The secretary shall consider any timely challenge submitted by an
identified entity. In making and publicly presenting a cost-driver
assessment, the secretary shall use the revised methodology adopted
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection [(d)] (h) of section 19a-754g
and examine the contribution of material changes in clinical risk and
payment methodologies.
Sec. 28. Subsection (d) of section 355 of public act 26-68 is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) Consistent with 26 CFR 1.501(r)-(4), as amended from time to
time, if a language is spoken by at least one thousand individuals or five
per cent of the community served by the hospital facility or likely to be
affected or encountered by the hospital facility, such hospital shall
translate each notice required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
[shall have the following statement printed on the first page of such
notice:
"If a language is spoken by at least one thousand individuals or five
per cent of the community served by the hospital facility or likely to be
affected or encountered by the hospital facility, then the hospital shall
translate the notice] into such other language. [".]
Public Act No. 26-76 22 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Sec. 29. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
title 16 of the general statutes, or the final decision and rulings of the
Public Utilities Regulatory Authority in docket number 24-08-03, the
project identified as "project number NE 53142" shall be eligible for a
tariff described in subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of subsection (a)
of section 16-244z of the general statutes under terms applicable to a
municipal customer, provided such project receives final approval from
the authority.
(b) The state, acting through the Commissioner of Administrative
Services, is authorized to contract with the project owner and the
Connecticut Green Bank to select electricity accounts of the state that
will be beneficial accounts for any power generated by the project
identified in subsection (a) of this section. In determining the project's
eligibility, the authority may consider the financial condition of the
municipality in which the project shall be located. Notwithstanding the
provisions of subdivision (34) of subsection (a) of section 16-1 of the
general statutes, the project will be deemed a customer-side distributed
resource for the purposes of section 16-243l of the general statutes.
Sec. 30. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (i) of section 4-176 of the general statutes, the Connecticut
Siting Council may reopen, upon application by the petitioner, the
petition for a declaratory ruling identified as "petition number 1668" for
the siting council's consideration. In determining whether to issue a
declaratory ruling pursuant to this section, the siting council may
consider the financial condition of the municipality in which the project
identified in said petition shall be located.
Sec. 31. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding any provision of the
general statutes or any regulations or procedures adopted by the Public
Utilities Regulatory Authority, the deadline for completing the project
identified as "project number 3066" in docket number 22-08-04 of the
authority shall be three years from the effective date of this section.
Public Act No. 26-76 23 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Sec. 32. Section 16-243hh of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Not later than January 1, 2025, each gas company, as defined in
section 16-1, shall institute a program to provide a rebate to any
customers of such company that use natural gas for a shared clean
energy facility, as defined in subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section
16-244z, that was selected in a solicitation pursuant to said subsection.
[on or before December 31, 2023.] The amount of such rebate shall equal
the retail delivery charge that such company charges such customer for
transporting natural gas to such shared clean energy facility. Such
company may recover the costs of providing such rebates through such
company's decoupling mechanism pursuant to section 16-19tt. The
authority may adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this section.
Sec. 33. Section 248 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Social Services shall report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, finance,
revenue and bonding and public health regarding the collection of
moneys for deposit in the hospital supplemental payment account and
the use of funds in such account during the preceding calendar year.
Sec. 34. Section 275 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2027, and applicable to income
years commencing on or after January 1, 2027):
(a) As used in this section, "eligible production company",
"production expenses or costs" and "state-certified qualified production"
Public Act No. 26-76 24 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
have the same meanings as provided in section 12-217jj of the general
statutes.
(b) (1) For the income years commencing January 1, 2027, and prior
to January 1, 2029, any eligible production company that is eligible for a
credit under subsection (b) of section 12-217jj of the general statutes may
apply to the Department of Economic and Community Development, in
the manner provided under subsection (h) of said section, for a
production tax credit voucher for an additional credit as provided under
this section.
(2) The additional credit for an eligible production company under
this section shall be for production expenses or costs incurred for a state-
certified qualified production for which principal photography
shooting occurs in the city of Bridgeport, Hartford or New Haven, or
any combination thereof, for at least [one day] twenty days, and shall be
as follows: (A) For any such company incurring such expenses or costs
of not less than one hundred thousand dollars, but not more than five
hundred thousand dollars, a credit equal to thirty per cent of such
expenses or costs; (B) for any such company incurring such expenses or
costs of more than five hundred thousand dollars, but not more than
one million dollars, a credit equal to thirty-five per cent of such expenses
or costs; and (C) for any such company incurring such expenses or costs
of more than one million dollars, a credit equal to fifty per cent of such
expenses or costs.
(3) The aggregate amount of all production tax credit vouchers issued
by the Department of Economic and Community Development for the
additional credit under this section shall not exceed one million five
hundred thousand dollars for income years commencing on or after
January 1, 2027, and prior to January 1, 2029.
(4) Upon the issuance of an eligibility certificate to an eligible
production company pursuant to subsection (h) of section 12-217jj of the
Public Act No. 26-76 25 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
general statutes, the Department of Economic and Community
Development shall, based on information provided in the application
for such certificate, determine whether such production reasonably
anticipates that principal photography shooting will occur in the city of
Bridgeport, Hartford or New Haven, or any combination thereof, for at
least twenty days, and that production expenses or costs will meet the
minimum threshold set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(5) If, at the time of issuance of an eligibility certificate pursuant to
subsection (h) of section 12-217jj of the general statutes, the Department
of Economic and Community Development determines that an eligible
production company's state-certified, qualified production may qualify
for the additional credit pursuant to this section, the department shall
provide written notice to such production company that such
production company may be eligible for the additional credit
established pursuant to this section, including a description of the
production cost or expense requirements described in subdivision (2) of
this subsection, and the application requirements for any such
production company to apply for a tax credit voucher under this section.
(6) Any notice provided by the Department of Economic and
Community Development, pursuant to subdivision (5) of this
subsection, shall identify an estimated amount reserved for an eligible
production company from the aggregate amount established pursuant
to subdivision (3) of this subsection, and, upon request, the remaining
balance of unreserved funds available under such aggregate amount.
Any such provision of notice and reservation of funds shall not
constitute final approval of the additional credit and shall not guarantee
the issuance of a production tax credit voucher. The issuance of any such
voucher shall remain subject to the eligible production company's
completion of the production, submission and approval of a production
tax credit voucher application, verification of qualified production
expenses or costs, satisfaction of the requirements of this subsection and
Public Act No. 26-76 26 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
compliance with all applicable provisions under section 12-217jj of the
general statutes.
(c) For production tax credit vouchers issued pursuant to this section,
all or part of any such credit may be claimed against the tax imposed
under chapter 207, 208, 211 or 219 of the general statutes, for the income
year in which the production expenses or costs were incurred, or in the
five immediately succeeding income years, and may be sold, assigned
or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part, in accordance with
subsection (e) of 12-217jj of the general statutes.
Sec. 35. Subsection (b) of section 216 of public act 26-68 is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
(b) Each insurer, health care center, hospital service corporation,
medical service corporation, fraternal benefit society or other entity that
delivers, issues for delivery, renews, amends or continues an individual
or group health insurance policy in this state providing coverage of the
type specified in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11) and (12) of section 38a-469
of the general statutes, or utilization review company that conducts
utilization review for such insurer, center, corporation, society or entity,
and issues prior authorization for, or precertifies, any infusion or
injection service to be provided at an infusion center on or after January
1, 2027, shall, at the time of issuing such prior authorization or
precertification for such service, provide the covered person with a
written or electronic notice disclosing that if such service is provided at
any hospital-based outpatient infusion center located outside the
hospital campus, such covered person may incur financial liability that
is greater than the financial liability such covered person would incur
for such service if such service were provided at a non-hospital-based
infusion center.
Sec. 36. Subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 57 of public act 26-
42 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
Public Act No. 26-76 27 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
July 1, 2026):
(2) Nothing in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be construed to
(A) prevent any officer, agent or person described in said subdivision,
[when off duty,] from accessing, traveling to and from, or remaining at
a law enforcement building that (i) was constructed and occupied by a
municipal or state law enforcement agency prior to July 1, 2026, (ii) is
operated by a municipal or state law enforcement agency, and (iii) is
located within two hundred fifty feet of an elections site, (B) prevent any
such officer, agent or person from voting in accordance with the
provisions of title 9 of the general statutes or, [otherwise] when off duty,
engaging in protected political expression, or [(B)] (C) prohibit any such
officer, agent or person from (i) passing within two hundred fifty feet of
an elections site only for as long as necessary to be within such two
hundred fifty feet while on the way to a place or location other than such
elections site, [or] (ii) when off duty, remaining within two hundred fifty
feet of an elections site only for as long as necessary to be within such
two hundred fifty feet while present at a place or location other than
such elections site, or (iii) residing within such two hundred fifty feet.
For purposes of this subdivision, "law enforcement unit building"
means any building or structure that is utilized by a police officer, as
defined in section 7-294a of the general statutes, in the course of
performing official duties, including, but not limited to, a headquarters,
a station, a substation or a barracks.
Sec. 37. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2027) (a) Any elector may submit a
request, in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary of the State,
to the municipal clerk of the municipality of such elector's voting
residence to automatically receive an application for an absentee ballot
for each election and referendum, and primary if applicable, conducted
in such municipality. For each active elector who submits a request
under this subsection, the municipal clerk shall issue an absentee ballot
application (1) ninety days prior to each such election, primary or
Public Act No. 26-76 28 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
referendum for which such elector is eligible to vote, or as soon as is
practicable, whichever is earlier, and (2) with such elector's information
already completed, except that the information of any person providing
assistance to such elector need not be already completed.
(b) Prior to the issuance of an absentee ballot application pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the registrars of voters and municipal clerk
of a municipality shall compare (1) the list of electors with automatic
absentee ballot application status in such municipality, against (2) the
official active registry list of such municipality, for the purpose of
identifying any elector who appears on the list described in subdivision
(1) of this subsection but does not appear on the list described in
subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(c) An elector with automatic absentee ballot application status under
subsection (a) of this section shall be removed from such status
whenever (1) such elector notifies the municipal clerk, in writing, that
such elector no longer wishes to retain such automatic absentee ballot
application status, (2) such elector has been identified as not appearing
on the official registry list of the municipality, in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (b) of this section, (3) an absentee ballot
application issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to such
elector by the municipal clerk is returned as undeliverable, or (4) such
elector's name is placed on the inactive registry list compiled under
section 9-35 of the general statutes.
Sec. 38. Section 9 of public act 26-42 is repealed. (Effective from passage)
Sec. 39. Section 55 of public act 26-68 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Sec. 40. Section 333 of public act 21-2 of the June special session is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
Public Act No. 26-76 29 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
The Commissioner of Social Services shall adjust rates of
reimbursement under the Medicaid program so that (1) a nurse-midwife
licensed pursuant to chapter 377 of the general statutes receives the
same rate as an obstetrician-gynecologist licensed pursuant to chapter
370 of the general statutes for performing the same medical service or
procedure, [and] (2) a podiatrist licensed pursuant to chapter 375 of the
general statutes receives the same rate as a physician licensed pursuant
to chapter 370 of the general statutes for performing the same medical
service or procedure, and (3) an optometrist licensed pursuant to
chapter 380 of the general statutes receives the same rate as a physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 370 of the general statutes for performing
the same medical service or procedure in Current Procedural
Terminology (CPT) codes 92004, 92014, 92015 and 92250. The
commissioner shall seek federal approval to amend the Medicaid state
plan, if necessary, to adjust rates of reimbursement in accordance with
this section.
Sec. 41. Section 217 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Campus" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-508c
of the general statutes;
(2) "Facility fee" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-
508c of the general statutes;
(3) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490
of the general statutes;
(4) "Infusion center" means a site that offers intravenous infusions
and intramuscular or subcutaneous injections of medications, fluids or
biological products for complex medical conditions, including, but not
limited to, cancers and autoimmune disorders; and
Public Act No. 26-76 30 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(5) "Surprise bill" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-
477aa of the general statutes.
(b) The Insurance Department, in consultation with the Office of the
Healthcare Advocate, shall, within available appropriations, conduct a
study of (1) potential methods to lower the costs associated with
infusion and injection services provided at hospital-based outpatient
infusion centers located outside hospital campuses, (2) appropriate
patient protections for stop-loss insurance coverage used in conjunction
with self-funded employee health benefit plans, and (3) surprise bills for
ground ambulance services.
(c) Not later than October 1, 2027, the Insurance Department shall
submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to insurance on the
results and recommendations of the study conducted pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section. Such report shall include, but need not be
limited to, recommendations concerning:
(1) Whether payments for services provided at an infusion center
should be (A) set at not greater than ten per cent above the Medicare
average sales price calculated in accordance with 42 CFR 414.904, as
amended from time to time, or a different reimbursement rate payable
under Medicare, or (B) based on data from the all-payer claims database
established under section 19a-755a of the general statutes; and
(2) Whether a facility fee for services provided at an infusion center
should be prohibited.
Sec. 42. Section 332 of public act 25-168, as amended by section 445 of
public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 17b-340d of the general
Public Act No. 26-76 31 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
statutes, the Commissioner of Social Services shall, within available
appropriations, increase nursing home facility rates to support wage
increases for [licensed nurses engaged solely in direct patient care
services and supports and not employed in administrative functions]
nursing, nurse's aide, dietary, housekeeping, laundry and maintenance
and plant operation personnel of three per cent effective July 1, 2025,
three per cent effective July 1, 2026, and four per cent effective January
1, 2027, except effective July 1, 2026, the director and assistant director
of nursing shall not be included. Facilities that receive a rate adjustment
for wage enhancements for employees but do not provide such
enhancements may be subject to a rate decrease in the same amount as
the adjustment.
Sec. 43. Section 17b-355 of the general statutes, as amended by section
6 of public act 26-74, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) In determining whether a request submitted pursuant to sections
17b-352 to 17b-354, inclusive, as amended by [this act] public act 26-74,
will be granted, modified or denied, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall consider the following: (1) The financial feasibility of the
request and its impact on the applicant's rates and financial condition,
(2) the contribution of the request to the quality, accessibility and cost-
effectiveness of the delivery of long-term care in the region, including
consideration of the nursing home's star rating on the five-star quality
rating system for nursing homes published by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services, (3) whether there is clear public need for the
request, (4) the relationship of any proposed change to the applicant's
current utilization statistics and the effect of the proposal on the
utilization statistics of other facilities in the applicant's service area, (5)
the business interests of all owners, partners, associates, incorporators,
directors, sponsors, stockholders and operators and the personal
background of such persons, and (6) any other factor which the
Public Act No. 26-76 32 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Department of Social Services deems relevant. In considering whether
there is clear public need for any request for the relocation of beds to a
replacement facility, or for new beds added to an existing facility or a
new facility, the commissioner shall consider whether there is a
demonstrated bed need in the towns within a fifteen-mile radius of the
town in which the beds are proposed to be located and whether the
availability of beds in the applicant's service area will be adversely
affected.
(b) Any proposal to relocate nursing home beds from an existing
facility to a new facility shall not increase the number of Medicaid
certified beds and shall result in the closure of at least one currently
licensed facility. The commissioner may request that any applicant
seeking to replace an existing facility reduce the number of beds in the
new facility by a percentage that is consistent with the department's
strategic state-wide long-term rebalancing plan for long-term care. If an
applicant seeking to replace an existing facility with a new facility owns
or operates more than one nursing facility, the commissioner may
request that the applicant close two or more facilities before approving
the proposal to build a new facility. The commissioner shall also
consider whether an application to establish a new or replacement
nursing facility proposes a nontraditional, small-house style nursing
facility and incorporates goals for nursing facilities referenced in the
department's strategic state-wide long-term rebalancing plan for long-
term care, including, but not limited to, (1) promoting person-centered
care, (2) providing enhanced quality of care, (3) creating community
space for all nursing facility residents, and (4) developing stronger
connections between the nursing facility residents and the surrounding
community.
(c) Demonstrated bed need shall be based on the recent occupancy
percentage of area nursing facilities with occupancy above ninety-six
per cent for a minimum of two consecutive quarters. The department
Public Act No. 26-76 33 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
may consider projected bed need into the future at occupancy above
ninety-six per cent using the latest strategic state-wide long-term
rebalancing plan for long-term care as published by the department. The
commissioner may also consider area specific utilization and reductions
in utilization rates to account for the increased use of less institutional
alternatives.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, as a component of
a project involving the relocation of nursing home beds to establish bed
configurations to not more than two beds per room, the commissioner
may establish bed need based on an occupancy percentage below
ninety-six per cent.
Sec. 44. Section 17b-372a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
Commissioners of Social Services, Correction and Mental Health and
Addiction Services may establish or contract for the establishment of a
chronic or convalescent nursing home on state-owned or private
property to care for individuals who (1) require the level of care
provided in a nursing home, and (2) are transitioning from a
correctional facility in the state, or (3) receive services from the
Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services. A nursing home
developed under this section is not required to comply with the
provisions of sections 17b-352 to 17b-354, inclusive, and subsection (b)
of section 19a-521b if such provisions are in conflict with this section.
Sec. 45. Section 420 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
Public Act No. 26-76 34 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2025, the school building project at Suffield Middle School in the town
of Suffield with costs not to exceed one hundred nineteen million five
hundred thousand dollars shall be included in section [1 of this act] 396
of public act 26-68 and shall subsequently be considered for a grant
commitment from the state, provided the town of Suffield files an
application for such school building project prior to July 1, [2026] 2027,
and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or
any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is
eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
reimbursement percentage determined pursuant to said section shall be
increased by ten percentage points for the town of Suffield for the school
building project at Suffield Middle School.
Sec. 46. Subdivision (5) of subsection (g) of section 13 of public act 26-
14 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
from passage):
(5) Hold or store the contracting public agency's automated license
plate reader data [(A) with the automated license plate reader data held
or stored pursuant to a contract with a different public agency
concerning automated license plate reader data or any such data held or
stored pursuant to a contract with any other person concerning such
data, or (B)] in a manner that is not in accordance with industry-
recognized data security practices, including, but not limited to, using
encryption when transmitting or storing such data.
Public Act No. 26-76 35 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Sec. 47. Section 52 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall distribute $250,000 as a regional
performance incentive program grant to the [Southeastern Connecticut]
South Central Region Council of Governments for a [pilot program to
consolidate] study on the consolidation of public service answering
points.
Sec. 48. Section 3-109 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The American robin, Turdus migratorius, shall be the state bird,
provided in the month of March of each year, the American robin and
Suzanne Brigit Bird, also known as Sue Bird, shall be the state birds.
Sec. 49. (Effective from passage) Not later than June 30, 2026, the sum of
$500,000 from the nonlapsing account described in section 12 of public
act 23-170 shall be provided as a grant-in-aid to the Northwest Resource
Recovery Authority.
Sec. 50. Section 12-704d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Angel investor" means an accredited investor, as defined by the
Securities and Exchange Commission, or network of accredited
investors who review new or proposed businesses for potential
investment and who may seek active involvement, such as consulting
and mentoring, in a qualified Connecticut business or a qualified
cannabis business, but "angel investor" does not include (A) a person
controlling fifty per cent or more of the Connecticut business or cannabis
business invested in by the angel investor, (B) a venture capital
Public Act No. 26-76 36 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
company, or (C) any bank, bank and trust company, insurance
company, trust company, national bank, savings association or building
and loan association for activities that are a part of its normal course of
business;
(2) "Cash investment" means the contribution of cash, at a risk of loss,
to a qualified Connecticut business or a qualified cannabis business in
exchange for qualified securities;
(3) "Connecticut business" means any business, other than a cannabis
business, with its principal place of business in Connecticut;
(4) "Related person" has the same meaning as provided in section 12-
217w;
(5) "Control" has the same meaning as provided in section 12-217w;
[(4)] (6) "Bioscience" means manufacturing pharmaceuticals,
medicines, medical equipment or medical devices and analytical
laboratory instruments, operating medical or diagnostic testing
laboratories, or conducting pure research and development in life
sciences;
[(5)] (7) "Advanced materials" means developing, formulating or
manufacturing advanced alloys, coatings, lubricants, refrigerants,
surfactants, emulsifiers or substrates;
[(6)] (8) "Photonics" means generation, emission, transmission,
modulation, signal processing, switching, amplification, detection and
sensing of light from ultraviolet to infrared and the manufacture,
research or development of opto-electronic devices, including, but not
limited to, lasers, masers, fiber optic devices, quantum devices,
holographic devices and related technologies;
[(7)] (9) "Information technology" means software publishing, motion
Public Act No. 26-76 37 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
picture and video production, teleproduction and postproduction
services, telecommunications, data processing, hosting and related
services, custom computer programming services, computer system
design, computer facilities management services, other computer
related services and computer training;
[(8)] (10) "Clean technology" means the production, manufacture,
design, research or development of clean energy, green buildings, smart
grid, high-efficiency transportation vehicles and alternative fuels,
environmental products, environmental remediation and pollution
prevention;
[(9)] (11) "Qualified securities" means any form of equity, including a
general or limited partnership interest, common stock, preferred stock,
with or without voting rights, without regard to seniority position that
must be convertible into common stock;
[(10)] (12) "Emerging technology business" means any business that
is engaged in bioscience, advanced materials, photonics, information
technology, clean technology or any other emerging technology as
determined by the Commissioner of Economic and Community
Development;
[(11)] (13) "Cannabis business" means a cannabis establishment (A)
for which a social equity applicant has been granted a provisional
license or a license, (B) in which a social equity applicant or social equity
applicants have an ownership interest of at least sixty-five per cent, and
(C) such social equity applicant or social equity applicants have control
of such establishment;
[(12)] (14) "Social equity applicant" has the same meaning as provided
in section 21a-420;
[(13)] (15) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420; and
Public Act No. 26-76 38 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
[(14)] (16) "Cannabis establishment" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-420.
(b) There shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this
chapter, other than the liability imposed by section 12-707, for a cash
investment by an angel investor of not less than twenty-five thousand
dollars in the qualified securities of a Connecticut business or a cannabis
business. The credit shall be in an amount equal to (1) twenty-five per
cent of such investor's cash investment in a Connecticut business, or (2)
forty per cent of such investor's cash investment in a cannabis business,
provided the total tax credits allowed to any angel investor shall not
exceed five hundred thousand dollars. The credit shall be claimed in the
taxable year in which such cash investment is made by the angel
investor. The credit may be sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in
whole or in part.
(c) To qualify for a tax credit pursuant to this section, a cash
investment shall be in:
(1) A Connecticut business that (A) has been approved as a qualified
Connecticut business pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; (B) had
annual gross revenues of less than one million dollars in the most recent
income year of such business; (C) has fewer than twenty-five employees,
not less than [seventy-five] fifty per cent of whom reside in this state;
(D) has been operating in this state for less than seven consecutive years;
(E) is primarily owned by the management of the business and their
families; and (F) received less than two million dollars in cash
investments eligible for the tax credits provided by this section; or
(2) A cannabis business that (A) has been approved as a qualified
cannabis business pursuant to subsection (d) of this section; (B) had
annual gross revenues of less than one million dollars in the most recent
income year of such business; (C) has fewer than twenty-five employees,
not less than seventy-five per cent of whom reside in this state; (D) is
Public Act No. 26-76 39 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
primarily owned by the management of the business and their families;
and (E) received less than two million dollars in cash investments
eligible for the tax credits provided by this section.
(d) (1) A Connecticut business or a cannabis business may apply to
Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated, for approval as a Connecticut
business or cannabis business, as applicable, qualified to receive cash
investments eligible for a tax credit pursuant to this section, provided
on and after July 1, 2026, separate applications from a Connecticut
business and related persons thereto shall be considered a single
application for a Connecticut business for purposes of this section. The
application shall include (A) the name of the business and a copy of the
organizational documents of such business, (B) a business plan,
including a description of the business and the management, product,
market and financial plan of the business, (C) a description of the
business's innovative technology, product or service, (D) a statement of
the potential economic impact of the business, including the number,
location and types of jobs expected to be created, (E) a description of the
qualified securities to be issued and the amount of cash investment
sought by the business, (F) a statement of the amount, timing and
projected use of the proceeds to be raised from the proposed sale of
qualified securities, and (G) such other information as the chief
executive officer of Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated, may require.
(2) Said chief executive officer shall, on a monthly basis, compile a list
of approved applications, categorized by the cash investments being
sought by the qualified Connecticut business or the qualified cannabis
business and type of qualified securities offered.
(e) (1) Any angel investor that intends to make a cash investment in
a business on such list may apply to Connecticut Innovations,
Incorporated, to reserve a tax credit in the amount indicated by such
investor. Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated, shall not reserve tax
credits under this section for any investments made in a qualified
Public Act No. 26-76 40 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Connecticut business on or after July 1, 2028, or for any investments
made in a qualified cannabis business on or after July 1, 2023.
(2) The aggregate amount of all tax credits under this section that may
be reserved by Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated, shall not exceed
(A) for cash investments made in qualified Connecticut businesses, six
million dollars annually for the fiscal years commencing July 1, 2010, to
July 1, 2012, inclusive, and five million dollars for each fiscal year
thereafter, and (B) for cash investments made in qualified cannabis
businesses, fifteen million dollars annually for the fiscal years
commencing July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022.
(3) With respect to the tax credits available under this section for
investments in qualified Connecticut businesses, Connecticut
Innovations, Incorporated, shall not reserve more than seventy-five per
cent of such tax credits for investments in emerging technology
businesses, except if any such credits remain available for reservation
after April first in any fiscal year, such remaining credits may be
reserved for investments in such businesses and may be prioritized for
veteran-owned, women-owned or minority-owned businesses and
businesses owned by individuals with disabilities.
(4) The amount of the credit allowed to any investor pursuant to this
section shall not exceed the amount of tax due from such investor under
this chapter, other than section 12-707, with respect to such taxable year.
Any tax credit that is claimed by the angel investor but not applied
against the tax due under this chapter, other than the liability imposed
under section 12-707, may be carried forward for the five immediately
succeeding taxable years until the full credit has been applied.
(f) If the angel investor is an S corporation or an entity treated as a
partnership for federal income tax purposes, the tax credit may be
claimed by the shareholders or partners of the angel investor. If the
angel investor is a single member limited liability company that is
Public Act No. 26-76 41 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
disregarded as an entity separate from its owner, the tax credit may be
claimed by such limited liability company's owner, provided such
owner is a person subject to the tax imposed under this chapter.
(g) A review of the cumulative effectiveness of the credit under this
section shall be conducted by Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated, by
July first annually. Such review shall include, but need not be limited to,
the number and type of Connecticut businesses and cannabis businesses
that received angel investments, the number of angel investors and the
aggregate amount of cash investments, the current status of each
Connecticut business and cannabis business that received angel
investments, the number of employees employed in each year following
the year in which such Connecticut business or cannabis business
received the angel investment and the economic impact in the state of
the Connecticut business or cannabis business that received the angel
investment. Such review shall be submitted to the Office of Policy and
Management and to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to commerce, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
Sec. 51. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Individual with limited-English proficiency" means an
individual whose primary and preferred language is not English, and
who has a limited ability to read, speak, write or understand English;
(2) "State agency" means any department, board, commission, office
or other agency within the executive branch of state government;
(3) "State-wide language access implementation plan" or "plan"
means the plan developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section;
(4) "High-priority public-facing document" means any printed or
electronic form, notice or instruction that is necessary to apply for,
obtain, maintain or renew a public benefit, public service, vital record
Public Act No. 26-76 42 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
or identification document and is specified as such in the state-wide
language access implementation plan;
(5) "Identification document" means a document that can be used to
verify the holder's identity, including, but not limited to, a driver's
license;
(6) "Vital records" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-36
of the general statutes;
(7) "Interpretation services" means the provision of spoken language
assistance, including, but not limited to, in-person interpretation,
telephonic interpretation and video remote interpretation, for purposes
of enabling an individual with limited-English proficiency to access
services, benefits, information, hearings, meetings, programs or other
interactions for government services;
(8) "Translation services" means the provision of written materials,
including, but not limited to, forms, applications, notices, instructions,
Internet web site content and other informational materials in languages
other than English; and
(9) "Sign language access" means the provision of qualified sign
language interpretation and other appropriate communication supports
for individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing or who use sign language
in order to access services, benefits, information, hearings, meetings,
programs or other interactions for government services.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management, in consultation with the Commissioners of
Administrative Services, Social Services and Public Health, and any
other department head or stakeholder deemed appropriate by the
secretary, shall develop a state-wide language access implementation
plan for state agencies. Such plan shall be designed to improve access to
public services and benefits and increase meaningful access to public
Public Act No. 26-76 43 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
programs, hearings, meetings, appeals, workforce development,
licensure, identification documents and other governmental
opportunities that support family economic engagement and mobility.
The secretary shall update such plan not less than every two years
thereafter.
(c) Such plan shall:
(1) Assess the language access needs of individuals with limited-
English proficiency in the state, using the most recent American
Community Survey published by the United States Census Bureau and
any available relevant state agency service data;
(2) Identify the twelve most common non-English languages spoken
by individuals with limited-English proficiency in the state;
(3) Inventory, or require the inventory of, public-facing printed and
electronic forms, applications, notices, Internet web sites, public
meetings, hearings, appeals, complaint processes, application processes,
workforce development programs and other civic or governmental
interactions and service delivery points used by state agencies;
(4) Identify and prioritize high-priority, public-facing documents and
interactions for phased translation and interpretation, including
identification of hearings, meetings, complaint processes and workforce
development programs for which live interpretation or sign language
access is necessary, and designate a limited number of high-priority,
public-facing documents and interactions for phase one implementation
of the plan;
(5) Establish a phased implementation schedule for state agencies,
including designation of which state agencies, documents, interactions
and service delivery points should be included in the phase one
implementation of the plan, in a manner that maximizes administrative
efficiencies and minimizes unnecessary costs by using, where
Public Act No. 26-76 44 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
practicable, centralized procurement of translation and interpretation
services, shared language access services templates and glossaries
across state agencies, existing personnel, technology-assisted translation
tools with appropriate review by state agency personnel for accuracy,
accessibility and public use, and other strategies identified by the
secretary;
(6) Establish recommended standards for translation services,
interpretation services, sign language access, accessibility, plain
language notices of available translation services and interpretation
services, and agency reporting;
(7) Include recommendations for potential expansion of language
access requirements, as appropriate, to local and regional boards of
education, the constituent units of the state system of public higher
education, health care facilities or institutions receiving state funds or
federal funds administered by the state, and state contractors; and
(8) Identify any legislation, appropriation, administrative action or
procurement change necessary to implement such plan and
recommendations for expansion.
(d) Not later than January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall submit a report,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to government administration,
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, education, higher
education, public health and human services. Such report shall include
(1) a summary of the plan developed pursuant to this section, or of any
updates to such plan, (2) any estimated costs or cost savings associated
with using centralized procurement, shared services, existing
personnel, technology-assisted translation tools and phased
implementation of the plan, (3) any recommendations for potential
Public Act No. 26-76 45 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
expansion of language access requirements, as described in subdivision
(7) of subsection (c) of this section, and (4) any recommendations for
legislation to implement the provisions of this section.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to (1) require any state
agency to translate any printed or electronic forms or applications
maintained by the state agency prior to any deadlines or phases
established in the state-wide language access implementation plan, (2)
limit the state-wide language access implementation plan to written
forms or applications, or (3) alter any separate obligations under state
or federal law relating to disabilities.
Sec. 52. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section,
"individual with limited-English proficiency", "sign language access",
"translation services" and "interpretation services" have the same
meanings as provided in section 51 of this act. Not later than January 1,
2027, the Joint Committee on Legislative Management shall develop a
language access plan for the legislative branch concerning public
hearings, public meetings, and notices and content posted on any
Internet web site, to improve access for individuals with limited-English
proficiency or individuals who need sign language access. Such plan
shall (1) identify legislative documents and interactions that should be
prioritized for translation services, interpretation services or sign
language access, (2) establish a process for individuals to request
translation or interpretation services for legislative public hearings or
public meetings, and (3) include any recommendations for any
legislation, appropriation or administrative action necessary to
implement such plan.
(b) Not later than January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Joint
Committee on Legislative Management shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to government administration and
Public Act No. 26-76 46 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies. Such report shall
include a summary of the language access plan or any revisions to such
plan and any recommendations for legislation or appropriations for the
implementation of such plan.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Joint Committee on Legislative
Management shall post information concerning the availability of
language assistance services and the process by which an individual
may require translation services, interpretation services or sign
language access on the Internet web site of the General Assembly.
Sec. 53. Section 31-3mm of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Labor Department, within available appropriations, shall
establish a program to distribute youth employment and training funds
to regional workforce development boards for services to persons ages
fourteen to twenty-four.
(b) Funds provided for in this section shall be allocated [as follows:
(1) Thirty-two and five-tenths per cent to Capitol Workforce Partners;
(2) twenty-two and five-tenths per cent to The Workforce Alliance; (3)
twelve and five-tenths per cent to The Workplace, Inc.; (4) twenty-two
and five-tenths per cent to the Northwest Regional Workforce
Investment Board, Inc.; and (5) ten per cent to the Eastern Connecticut
Workforce Investment Board] to the regional workforce development
boards by the Labor Commissioner based on a formula established by
the Labor Commissioner, in collaboration with the regional workforce
development boards, that utilizes available data, including, but not
limited to, (1) the number of students in each workforce development
region that are eligible for free or reduced-price lunch, (2) the number
of economically disadvantaged youth in each workforce development
region determined by the most recent American Community Survey
conducted by United States Census Bureau, and (3) the number of at-
Public Act No. 26-76 47 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
risk students, as defined in section 21 of public act 24-45, in each
workforce development region, provided the amount allocated to the
Northwest Regional Workforce Investment Board, Inc. shall not be less
than the amount allocated to such board in the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026.
(c) The Labor Commissioner, in collaboration with the regional
workforce development boards, may update the formula established
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section in order to reflect current
conditions in the workforce development regions, provided the amount
allocated to the Northwest Regional Workforce Investment Board, Inc.
shall not be less than the amount allocated to such board in the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026.
Sec. 54. Section 464 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The sum of $100,000,006 is appropriated to the Office of Policy and
Management, for Various Municipal Grants, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, and shall be made available as a one-time payment in said
fiscal year and expended as follows:
Grant for Fiscal
Year
Town 2026
Andover 17,751
Ansonia 261,746
Ashford 24,858
Avon 60,304
Barkhamsted 20,054
Beacon Falls 32,957
Berlin 75,947
Bethany 21,913
Bethel 95,477
Bethlehem 14,158
Bloomfield 264,102
Public Act No. 26-76 48 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Bolton 29,551
Bozrah 12,185
Branford 70,511
Bridgeport 10,373,486
Bridgewater 1,831
Bristol 991,338
Brookfield 46,102
Brooklyn 106,086
Burlington 44,057
Canaan 29,770
Canterbury 36,403
Canton 29,695
Chaplin 155,805
Cheshire 715,676
Chester 21,671
Clinton 51,998
Colchester 116,408
Colebrook 6,257
Columbia 22,616
Cornwall 7,988
Coventry 61,253
Cromwell 66,024
Danbury 1,592,148
Darien 28,726
Deep River 18,488
Derby 426,691
Durham 25,339
East Granby 30,354
East Haddam 35,476
East Hampton 104,793
East Hartford 1,390,427
East Haven 342,732
East Lyme 536,657
East Windsor 77,422
Eastford 14,635
Easton 20,603
Ellington 64,632
Enfield 575,188
Essex 15,263
Public Act No. 26-76 49 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Fairfield 818,108
Farmington 1,669,896
Franklin 15,866
Glastonbury 76,932
Goshen 7,837
Granby 40,940
Greenwich 161,948
Griswold 171,970
Groton 2,239,466
Guilford 52,719
Haddam 42,348
Hamden 1,572,111
Hampton 14,776
Hartford 13,107,801
Hartland 27,482
Harwinton 25,174
Hebron 30,258
Kent 15,707
Killingly 333,903
Killingworth 30,712
Lebanon 41,770
Ledyard 1,703,834
Lisbon 42,901
Litchfield 35,537
Lyme 7,909
Madison 205,858
Manchester 1,001,403
Mansfield 2,613,732
Marlborough 30,635
Meriden 1,518,429
Middlebury 33,414
Middlefield 16,332
Middletown 2,348,250
Milford 667,970
Monroe 51,404
Montville 2,090,413
Morris 7,647
Naugatuck 418,778
New Britain 4,671,689
Public Act No. 26-76 50 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
New Canaan 14,857
New Fairfield 42,694
New Hartford 22,147
New Haven 12,419,995
New London 2,912,568
New Milford 188,992
Newington 453,379
Newtown 216,181
Norfolk 27,508
North Branford 49,136
North Canaan 36,047
North Haven 265,182
North Stonington 1,336,723
Norwalk 1,432,992
Norwich 3,126,949
Old Lyme 17,974
Old Saybrook 29,797
Orange 86,627
Oxford 103,082
Plainfield 283,649
Plainville 121,099
Plymouth 133,545
Pomfret 32,424
Portland 52,900
Preston 1,807,504
Prospect 47,719
Putnam 164,942
Redding 48,331
Ridgefield 44,831
Rocky Hill 471,899
Roxbury 2,027
Salem 35,835
Salisbury 5,599
Scotland 19,307
Seymour 114,457
Sharon 10,902
Shelton 135,076
Sherman 3,450
Simsbury 76,945
Public Act No. 26-76 51 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Somers 425,850
South Windsor 77,457
Southbury 115,615
Southington 181,419
Sprague 45,613
Stafford 161,510
Stamford 1,550,880
Sterling 56,351
Stonington 40,066
Stratford 406,351
Suffield 516,210
Thomaston 42,738
Thompson 71,358
Tolland 52,389
Torrington 743,529
Trumbull 125,054
Union 37,619
Vernon 325,941
Voluntown 172,490
Wallingford 270,800
Warren 1,732
Washington 8,299
Waterbury 5,114,077
Waterford 171,858
Watertown 278,092
West Hartford 392,543
West Haven 1,336,369
Westbrook 46,507
Weston 6,109
Westport 188,683
Wethersfield 366,924
Willington 55,458
Wilton 45,578
Winchester 136,056
Windham 1,819,472
Windsor 154,121
Windsor Locks 745,276
Wolcott 95,678
Woodbridge 13,949
Public Act No. 26-76 52 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Woodbury 26,755
Woodstock 32,548
(b) The funds appropriated in subsection (a) of this section to the
Office of Policy and Management, for Various Municipal Grants, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse and shall be available to
the Office of Policy and Management for the same purpose for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, each municipality shall report to
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management concerning the
expenditure of the grant identified in subsection (a) of this section.
(d) Such one-time payment to the town of Bridgeport shall not be
considered part of the budgeted appropriation for education for the
town for purposes of calculating the minimum budget requirement for
the town of Bridgeport pursuant to section 10-262j of the general
statutes.
Sec. 55. Section 480 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The sum of [$3,000,000] $4,000,000 of the amount appropriated in
section [1] 2 of public act 25-168, as amended by [this act] public act 26-
68, to the Department of Transportation, for Rail Operations, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, [2026, and the] 2027, shall be made available
in said fiscal year for the Shore Line East rail line.
(b) The sum of [$4,000,000] $3,000,000 of the amount appropriated in
[said] section 2 of public act 25-168 to the Department of Transportation,
for Rail Operations, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be
[made available] expended in said fiscal [years] year for the purpose of
increasing service on the Shore Line East rail line.
Sec. 56. Subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section 10a-174d of the
Public Act No. 26-76 53 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
2026 supplement to the general statutes, as amended by section 470 of
public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(4) "Qualifying student" means any person who (A) participated and
maintained program eligibility in the debt-free community college
program, established pursuant to section 10a-174, and received an
associate's degree at the Connecticut State Community College during
the fall semester of 2025 or spring semester of 2026, or any semester
thereafter, (B) enrolls as a full-time or part-time student for the fall
semester of 2026, or any semester thereafter, at a state university within
the Connecticut State University System or Charter Oak State College in
a program leading to a bachelor's degree, (C) is classified as an in-state
student pursuant to section 10a-29, (D) made satisfactory academic
progress while enrolled at the Connecticut State Community College
and continues to make satisfactory academic progress while enrolled at
such state university or Charter Oak State College, (E) has completed
the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, and (F) has accepted all
available financial aid;
Sec. 57. Section 356 of public act 26-68 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Sec. 58. Section 207 of public act 26-68 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Sec. 59. Subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 274 of public act
26-68 is amended to read as follows (Effective January 1, 2027):
(2) The workforce and productivity gap contribution plan shall
include:
(A) A formula for a surcharge to be assessed annually for each income
or taxable year in which an employer maintains a productivity gap.
Such surcharge shall reflect the financial delta between an employer's
Public Act No. 26-76 54 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
baseline productivity levels and its reduced payroll expenses for the
applicable income or taxable year, and shall be structured to ensure that
efficiency gains realized through the displacement of employees are
recaptured by the state on an ongoing basis to mitigate the resulting
economic impact;
[(B) An augmented productivity tax exemption that ensures that any
augmented productivity achieved by an employer is permanently
exempt from taxation by the state;]
[(C)] (B) Administrative procedures for the reporting and collection
of such surcharge, based on Connecticut-specific payroll and tax data;
and
[(D)] (C) The establishment of a workforce and economic stability
account, in which the [surcharges] surcharge collected [shall be
deposited and] funds shall be used [exclusively for the purposes of
workforce retraining, technical education and career transition
programs for displaced employees] for grants to employers to acquire
and train staff on generative or assistive artificial intelligence
technologies that demonstrate a measurable increase in per-worker
output without a corresponding reduction in headcount.
Sec. 60. (Effective from passage) Up to $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by public act
26-68, to the Department of Correction, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available to the Office of the
Healthcare Advocate to conduct a study on Department of Correction
facilities attaining accreditation for health services, including mental
health services, from the National Commission on Correctional Health
Care.
Sec. 61. Section 250 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-76 55 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
There is established an account to be known as the ["innocence
project] "CT innocence fund revolving loan account", which shall be a
separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any moneys
required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account
shall be expended by the Judicial Branch for the purposes of the
provision of loans to claimants who may meet the qualifications for
compensation pursuant to section 54-102uu of the general statutes.
Sec. 62. Section 251 of public act 26-68 is amended to read as follows
(Effective from passage):
The sum of $400,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of public
act 25-168, to the Judicial Department, for Legal Aid, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $500,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, to the Judicial
Department, for Legal Aid, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall
be transferred to the [innocence project] CT innocence fund revolving
loan account established in section 250 of [this act] public act 26-68.
Sec. 63. Section 27-19e of the general statutes, as amended by section
487 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in
lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
[(a)] There is established an account to be known as the "Governor's
Guards horse account", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing account.
The account shall contain any moneys required by law to be deposited
in the account, which shall include, but not be limited to, donations for
the specific purpose of offsetting the costs of maintaining Governor's
Guards' horses. Moneys in the account shall be allocated and accounted
for by each unit. Funds generated by or attributable to a specific unit
shall be credited to that unit and expended solely for expenses incurred
in connection with the costs of maintaining the Governor's Guards
horses that are related to the operations of that unit.
Public Act No. 26-76 56 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
[(b) There is established a subaccount within the Governor's Guards
horse account, established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to
be known as the "First Company Governor's Horse Guard account" to
be used solely for activities relating to the First Company Governor's
Horse Guard in Avon.
(c) There is established a subaccount within the Governor's Guards
horse account, established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to
be known as the "Second Company Governor's Horse Guard account"
to be used solely for activities relating to the Second Company
Governor's Horse Guard in Newtown.
(d)] Moneys in the account shall be expended by the Adjutant
General for the purposes of facilitating the operations of the Governor's
Guards, in accordance with the provisions of this section.
Sec. 64. Section 7 of public act 26-21 is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The [Department of Education] Commissioner of Transportation
shall administer a grant program to provide grants to local and regional
boards of education for the (1) purchase of passes for the use of [state-
owned or state-controlled bus] public bus transportation services,
including services provided by transit districts established under
chapter 103a of the general statutes, and (2) distribution of such passes,
without cost, to students who are enrolled in grades nine to twelve,
inclusive, of a public school under the jurisdiction of such local or
regional board of education. Applications for grants shall be filed with
the [department] commissioner at such time and in such manner as the
[department] commissioner prescribes. The [department] commissioner
may develop guidelines and grant criteria as [it] the commissioner
deems necessary to administer such grant program.
(b) Each local or regional board of education receiving a grant award
Public Act No. 26-76 57 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
under this section shall submit, at such time and in such form as the
[department] commissioner prescribes, any reports and financial
statements required by the [department] commissioner. If the
[department] commissioner finds that any grant awarded pursuant to
this section is being used for purposes that are not in conformity with
the purposes of this section, the [department] commissioner may
require the repayment of the grant to the state.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
[Department of Education] commissioner shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to education and transportation. Such
report shall include, but need not be limited to, the amount of grants
awarded during the prior year and an assessment of the impact of the
grant program on student outcomes.
Sec. 65. (Effective from passage) The sum of $2,500,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 2 of public act 25-168, as amended by public act
26-68, to the Department of Transportation, for Bus Operations, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be expended by the department in
said fiscal year for the purpose of (1) discounting the lawful charge to
use state-owned or state-controlled bus public transportation for
veterans, as defined in section 27-103 of the general statutes, and
students who are enrolled in grades nine to twelve, inclusive, of a public
school, and (2) issuing grants under the program established pursuant
to section 7 of public act 26-21 and section 64 of this act.
Sec. 66. Section 31-3l of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes,
as amended by section 27 of public act 26-12, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The members of a board shall be appointed by the chief elected
officials of the municipalities in the region in accordance with the
Public Act No. 26-76 58 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
provisions of an agreement entered into by such municipalities. In the
absence of an agreement the appointments shall be made by the
Governor. The membership of each board shall satisfy the requirements
for a local board as provided under the Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act. [and include a regional workforce navigator described
in subsection (b) of this section.]
(b) [Each] A regional workforce navigator shall be employed by each
regional workforce development board and shall coordinate with [the]
such regional workforce development boards, the Governor's
Workforce Council and the Labor Department in order to connect
individuals participating in adult education programs and students
enrolled in grades nine to twelve, inclusive, in a public school with
workforce opportunities, including, but not limited to, internships,
apprenticeships, job shadowing opportunities and credentials offered in
the state. For purposes of this subsection "credential" has the same
meaning as provided in section 10a-35b.
Sec. 67. Subsection (kk) of section 36 of public act 25-168, as amended
by section 12 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(kk) The sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by [this act] public act 26-68, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried
forward and made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
and the sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in said section to the
Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to provide a
grant to the United Way of Coastal [Fairfield County] and Western
Connecticut for the Bridgeport Public Schools Debate League.
Sec. 68. Section 41 of public act 26-68 is amended to read as follows
Public Act No. 26-76 59 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(Effective from passage):
Up to $1,150,000 of the unexpended balance of funds appropriated in
section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by [this act] public act 26-68,
to the Department of Economic and Community Development, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse
on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant in-aid to Working
Cities [Challenge/Middletown] Challenge, provided $150,000 of said
amount shall be used for Middletown Works.
Sec. 69. Section 5-198 of the general statutes, as amended by section
181 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in
lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
The offices and positions filled by the following-described
incumbents shall be exempt from the classified service:
(1) All officers and employees of the Judicial Department;
(2) All officers and employees of the Legislative Department;
(3) All officers elected by popular vote;
(4) All agency heads, members of boards and commissions and other
officers appointed by the Governor;
(5) All persons designated by name in any special act to hold any state
office;
(6) All officers, noncommissioned officers and enlisted men in the
military or naval service of the state and under military or naval
discipline and control;
(7) (A) All correctional wardens, as provided in section 18-82, and (B)
all superintendents of state institutions, the State Librarian, the
Public Act No. 26-76 60 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
president of The University of Connecticut and any other commissioner
or administrative head of a state department or institution who is
appointed by a board or commission responsible by statute for the
administration of such department or institution;
(8) The State Historian appointed by the State Library Board;
(9) Deputies to the administrative head of each department or
institution designated by statute to act for and perform all of the duties
of such administrative head during such administrative head's absence
or incapacity;
(10) Executive assistants to each state elective officer and each
department head, as defined in section 4-5, provided (A) each position
of executive assistant shall have been created in accordance with section
5-214, and (B) in no event shall the Commissioner of Administrative
Services or the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
approve more than four executive assistants for a department head and,
for any department with two or more deputies, more than two executive
assistants for each such deputy;
(11) One personal secretary to the administrative head and to each
undersecretary or deputy to such head of each department or
institution;
(12) All members of the professional and technical staffs of the
constituent units of the state system of higher education, as defined in
section 10a-1, of all other state institutions of learning, of the Board of
Regents for Higher Education, and of the agricultural experiment
station at New Haven, professional and managerial employees of the
Department of Education and the Office of Early Childhood, teachers
and administrators employed by the Technical Education and Career
System and teachers certified by the State Board of Education and
employed in teaching positions at state institutions;
Public Act No. 26-76 61 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(13) Physicians, dentists, student nurses in institutions and other
professional specialists who are employed on a part-time basis;
(14) Persons employed to make or conduct a special inquiry,
investigation, examination or installation;
(15) Students in educational institutions who are employed on a part-
time basis;
(16) Forest fire wardens provided for by section 23-36;
(17) Patients or inmates of state institutions who receive
compensation for services rendered therein;
(18) Employees of the Governor including employees working at the
executive office, official executive residence at 990 Prospect Avenue,
Hartford and the Washington D.C. office;
(19) Persons filling positions expressly exempted by statute from the
classified service;
(20) Librarians employed by the State Board of Education or any
constituent unit of the state system of higher education;
(21) All officers and employees of the Division of Criminal Justice;
(22) Professional employees in the education professions bargaining
unit of the Department of Aging and Disability Services;
(23) Lieutenant colonels in the Division of State Police within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection;
(24) The Deputy State Fire Marshal within the Department of
Administrative Services;
(25) The chief administrative officer of the Workers' Compensation
Commission;
Public Act No. 26-76 62 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(26) Employees in the education professions bargaining unit;
(27) Disability policy specialists employed by the Council on
Developmental Disabilities;
(28) The director for digital media and motion picture activities in the
Department of Economic and Community Development; and
(29) (A) Any Director of Communications 1, (B) Director of
Communications 1 (Rc), (C) Director of Communications 2, (D) Director
of Communications 2 (Rc), (E) Legislative Program Manager, (F)
Communications and Legislative Program Manager, (G) Director of
Legislation, [Regulation and Communication] Regulations and
Communications, (H) Legislative and Administrative Advisor 1, (I)
Legislative and Administrative Advisor 2, (J) Agency Legal Director,
other than Agency Legal Director of the Department of Revenue
Services or the Office of Policy and Management General Counsel, or
(K) Energy and Environmental Protection Office Director (Legal), [or
First Assistant Commissioner of Revenue Services,] as such positions
are classified within the Executive Department.
Sec. 70. (Effective from passage) Section 2 of public act 26-75 shall take
effect from passage and be applicable to income and taxable years
commencing on or after January 1, 2027.
Sec. 71. Subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 314 of public act
22-118 is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) Grants-in-aid to food systems or food resource organizations for
capital improvements or food system enhancements, not exceeding
$10,000,000.
Sec. 72. Subsection (b) of section 42-517 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes, as amended by section 7 of public act 25-113, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
Public Act No. 26-76 63 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
2026):
(b) The following information and data are exempt from the
provisions of sections 42-515 to 42-526, inclusive: (1) Protected health
information under HIPAA; (2) patient-identifying information for
purposes of 42 USC 290dd-2; (3) identifiable private information for
purposes of the federal policy for the protection of human subjects
under 45 CFR 46; (4) identifiable private information that is otherwise
information collected as part of human subjects research pursuant to the
good clinical practice guidelines issued by the International Council for
Harmonization of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for
Human Use; (5) personal data for purposes of the protection of human
subjects under 21 CFR Parts 6, 50 and 56, or personal data used or shared
in research, as defined in 45 CFR 164.501, that is conducted in
accordance with the standards set forth in this subdivision and
subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection, or other research conducted
in accordance with applicable law; (6) information and documents
created for purposes of the Health Care Quality Improvement Act of
1986, 42 USC 11101 et seq.; (7) patient safety work product for purposes
of section 19a-127o and the Patient Safety and Quality Improvement
Act, 42 USC 299b-21 et seq., as amended from time to time; (8)
information derived from any of the health care-related information
listed in this subsection that is de-identified in accordance with the
requirements for de-identification pursuant to HIPAA; (9) information
originating from and intermingled to be indistinguishable with, or
information treated in the same manner as, information exempt under
this subsection that is maintained by a covered entity or business
associate, program or qualified service organization, as specified in 42
USC 290dd-2, as amended from time to time; (10) information used for
public health activities and purposes as authorized by HIPAA,
community health activities and population health activities; (11) the
collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication or use of any
personal information bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit
Public Act No. 26-76 64 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
characteristics or mode of living by a consumer reporting agency,
furnisher or user that provides information for use in a consumer report,
and by a user of a consumer report, but only to the extent that such
activity is regulated by and authorized under the Fair Credit Reporting
Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq., as amended from time to time; (12) personal
data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in compliance with the
Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 USC 2721 et seq., as amended
from time to time; (13) personal data regulated by the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC 1232g et seq., as amended
from time to time; (14) personal data collected, processed, sold or
disclosed in compliance with the Farm Credit Act, 12 USC 2001 et seq.,
as amended from time to time; (15) data processed or maintained (A) in
the course of an individual applying to, employed by or acting as an
agent or independent contractor of a controller, processor, consumer
health data controller or third party, to the extent that the data are
collected and used within the context of that role, (B) as the emergency
contact information of an individual under sections 42-515 to 42-526,
inclusive, used for emergency contact purposes, or (C) that are
necessary to retain to administer benefits for another individual relating
to the individual who is the subject of the information under subdivision
(1) of this subsection and used for the purposes of administering such
benefits; (16) personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in
relation to price, route or service, as such terms are used in the Federal
Aviation Act of 1958, 49 USC 40101 et seq., and the Airline Deregulation
Act of 1978, 49 USC 41713, as said acts may be amended from time to
time; (17) data subject to Title V of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC
6801 et seq., as amended from time to time; [and] (18) information
included in a limited data set, as described in 45 CFR 164.514(e), as
amended from time to time, to the extent such information is used,
disclosed and maintained in the manner specified in 45 CFR 164.514(e),
as amended from time to time; and (19) precise geolocation data that has
been deidentified or aggregated from personal data and is collected,
Public Act No. 26-76 65 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
used, processed, shared or transferred by or to the Department of
Transportation for the purposes of transportation planning; traffic
management and operations; highway safety analysis; infrastructure
design, maintenance or performance monitoring; or public sector
research conducted by or on behalf of an authorized state agency.
Sec. 73. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) (1) Each candidate for
presidential elector who is endorsed for nomination to such office by a
political party under section 9-388 of the general statutes, or who files a
candidacy for nomination to such office with a political party
designation under section 9-453b of the general statutes, shall execute
the following pledge: "If chosen for the office of presidential elector, I
agree to serve and to mark my electoral college ballots for the nominees
for President and Vice President of the political party by which I was
nominated.". A copy of such executed pledge shall be included in the
filing of the certificate of endorsement or candidacy for nomination, as
applicable.
(2) If a political party's nominee for President or Vice President dies
or withdraws as a candidate in accordance with such political party's
rules prior to the meeting of presidential electors under section 9-176 of
the general statutes, the pledge executed under subdivision 1 of this
subsection shall apply to such political party's successor nominee.
(b) Each candidate for presidential elector who files a candidacy for
nomination to such office without a political party designation under
section 9-453b of the general statutes, or who registers a candidacy
associated with a write-in candidate for President under subsection (b)
of section 9-175 of the general statutes, shall execute the following
pledge: "If chosen for the office of presidential elector, I agree to serve
and to mark my electoral college ballots for the candidate for President
listed on this filing and for such candidate's running mate as Vice
President.". A copy of such executed pledge shall be included in the
filing of the candidacy for nomination or the registration associated with
Public Act No. 26-76 66 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
a write-in candidate for President, as applicable.
Sec. 74. Section 9-176 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The presidential electors of the state shall meet at the office of the
Secretary of the State at twelve o'clock noon on the first Tuesday after
the second Wednesday of the December following their election [and]
to cast their electoral college ballots for President and Vice President, as
required by the Constitution and laws of the United States. [, shall cast
their ballots for President and Vice President. Each such elector shall
cast such elector's ballots for the candidates under whose names such
elector ran on the official election ballot, as provided in section 9-175]
The Secretary of the State shall preside over the casting of such ballots.
(b) (1) If any [such] presidential elector is absent or if there is a
vacancy in the [electoral college] presidential electors of the state for any
cause, the presidential electors present shall [, before voting for
President and Vice President, elect] choose by ballot an [elector] eligible
person to fill such vacancy, and the person so chosen shall be a
presidential elector, shall perform the duties of such office and shall cast
his or her electoral college ballots for the candidates to whom the
presidential elector that he or she is replacing was pledged.
(2) To be eligible to be chosen to fill a vacancy in the presidential
electors of the state under subdivision (1) of this subsection, a person
shall execute the following pledge: "I agree to serve and to mark my
electoral college ballots consistent with the pledge of the presidential
elector who I am replacing.".
(c) The Secretary of the State shall provide to each presidential elector
the electoral college ballots for President and Vice President. Each
presidential elector shall complete such ballots by marking such ballots
with his or her votes for President and Vice President, respectively, and
Public Act No. 26-76 67 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
affixing his or her signature and legibly printed name to such ballots.
(d) Each presidential elector shall present such completed ballots to
the Secretary of the State, who shall examine such ballots and accept as
cast each such ballot marked consistent with the pledge executed by
such presidential elector under section 73 of this act or subdivision (2)
of subsection (b) of this section, as applicable. In the case of an electoral
college ballot marked inconsistent with the pledge so executed, the
Secretary shall not accept as cast such ballot.
(e) Any presidential elector who refuses to comply with any
provision of subsection (c) or (d) of this section, or marks any electoral
college ballot inconsistent with the pledge executed by such presidential
elector under section 73 of this act or subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of
this section, shall forfeit the office of presidential elector and cause a
vacancy in the presidential electors of the state, which vacancy shall be
filled in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection
(b) of this section. Each time such a vacancy is so filled, the process set
forth in subsections (c) and (d) of this section shall be repeated until all
electoral college ballots of all presidential electors of the state have been
accepted as cast.
(f) After all electoral college ballots of all presidential electors of the
state have been accepted as cast, the Secretary of the State shall furnish
six duplicate originals of the certificate of ascertainment of appointment
of presidential electors previously issued and transmitted by the
Secretary pursuant to subsection (b) of section 9-315 or an amended
version of such certificate prepared pursuant to subsection (h) of this
section, as applicable, to the presidential electors. The Secretary shall
then assist such presidential electors with preparing, signing and
transmitting the six certificates of votes required under 3 USC Sections
9 to 11, inclusive, as amended from time to time, and annexing to all
certificates of votes the duplicate originals of the most recent version of
the certificate of ascertainment described in this subdivision.
Public Act No. 26-76 68 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(g) Any presidential elector who refuses to sign any of the certificates
of votes, as provided in subsection (f) of this section, shall forfeit the
office of presidential elector and cause a vacancy in the presidential
electors of the state, which vacancy shall be filled in accordance with the
provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section. Each time
such a vacancy is so filled, the process set forth in subsections (c), (d)
and (f) of this section shall be repeated until all electoral college ballots
of all presidential electors of the state have been accepted as cast and all
certificates of votes have been signed by all such presidential electors.
(h) After all electoral college ballots of all presidential electors of the
state have been accepted as cast and all certificates of votes have been
signed by all such presidential electors, the Secretary of the State shall
prepare a final list of presidential electors of the state. Whenever the
final list of presidential electors of the state differs from the list of
presidential electors of the state that was included on the certificate of
ascertainment of appointment of presidential electors previously issued
and transmitted by the Secretary of the State pursuant to subsection (b)
of section 9-315, the Secretary shall immediately (1) prepare an amended
certificate of ascertainment of appointment of presidential electors that
complies with the provisions of 3 USC 5(a)(2), as amended from time to
time, (2) issue such amended certificate, and (3) transmit, in the most
expeditious method available, such amended certificate to the Archivist
of the United States.
(i) Any presidential elector who fails to mark his or her electoral
college ballots consistent with the pledge he or she has executed under
section 73 of this act or subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section,
as applicable, shall be ineligible upon such failure and thereafter to the
office of presidential elector.
Sec. 75. Section 9-315 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-76 69 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(a) The votes returned as cast for a senator in Congress,
representatives in Congress and presidential electors shall be publicly
counted by the Treasurer, Secretary of the State and Comptroller on the
last Wednesday of the month in which [they] such votes were cast, and
such votes shall be counted in conformity to any decision rendered by
the judges of the Supreme Court as provided in section 9-323. In
accordance with the count so made, they shall, on said day, declare what
persons are elected senators in the Congress of the United States or
representatives in Congress, and the Secretary of the State shall
forthwith notify [them] such persons by mail of their election; and,
except in the event that the Agreement Among the States to Elect the
President by National Popular Vote under section 9-175a has taken
effect in accordance with Article IV of said agreement, they shall declare
the proper number of persons having the greatest number of votes to be
presidential electors and, in case of an equal vote for said presidential
electors, shall determine by lot from the persons having such equal
number of votes the persons appointed, and the Secretary of the State
shall forthwith notify [them] such persons by mail of their appointment.
(b) For the purposes of the Electoral Count Reform Act of 2022, P.L.
117-328, Div. P, Title I, as amended from time to time, the Secretary of
the State shall be the executive of the state responsible for issuing a
certificate of ascertainment of appointment of presidential electors and,
immediately after such issuance, transmitting such certificate to the
Archivist of the United States. In preparing such certificate, the
Secretary shall specify in the text thereof that (1) the presidential electors
appointed under subsection (a) of this section will serve as such unless
a vacancy occurs in the presidential electors of the state before the
conclusion of the meeting held under section 9-176, in which case an
eligible person shall be chosen to fill such vacancy in accordance with
the provisions of said section, and (2) if an eligible person is chosen to
fill such a vacancy, the Secretary shall issue an amended certificate of
ascertainment of appointment of presidential electors, stating the names
Public Act No. 26-76 70 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
comprising the final list of presidential electors of the state, and shall
transmit such amended certificate to the Archivist of the United States.
Sec. 76. Subsection (a) of section 17b-3 of the general statutes, as
amended by section 158 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Social Services shall administer all law
under the jurisdiction of the Department of Social Services. The
commissioner shall have the power and duty to do the following: (1)
Administer, coordinate and direct the operation of the department; (2)
adopt and enforce such regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, as
are necessary to implement the purposes of the department as
established by statute; (3) establish rules for the internal operation and
administration of the department; (4) establish and develop programs
and administer services to achieve the purposes of the department as
established by statute; (5) enter into a contract, including, but not limited
to, up to five contracts with other states, for facilities, services and
programs to implement the purposes of the department as established
by statute; (6) process applications and requests for services promptly;
(7) with the approval of the Comptroller and in accordance with such
procedures as may be specified by the Comptroller, make payments to
providers of services for individuals who are eligible for benefits from
the department as appropriate; (8) make no duplicate awards for items
of assistance once granted, except for replacement of lost or stolen
checks on which payment has been stopped; (9) promote economic self-
sufficiency where appropriate in the department's programs, policies,
practices and staff interactions with recipients; (10) act as advocate for
the need of more comprehensive and coordinated programs for persons
served by the department; (11) plan services and programs for persons
served by the department; (12) coordinate outreach activities by public
and private agencies assisting persons served by the department; (13)
consult and cooperate with area and private planning agencies; (14)
Public Act No. 26-76 71 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
advise and inform municipal officials and officials of social service
agencies about social service programs and collect and disseminate
information pertaining thereto, including information about federal,
state, municipal and private assistance programs and services; (15)
encourage and facilitate effective communication and coordination
among federal, state, municipal and private agencies; (16) inquire into
the utilization of state and federal government resources which offer
solutions to problems of the delivery of social services; (17) conduct,
encourage and maintain research and studies relating to social services
development; (18) prepare, review and encourage model
comprehensive social service programs; (19) maintain an inventory of
data and information and act as a clearing house and referral agency for
information on state and federal programs and services; (20) conduct,
encourage and maintain research and studies and advise municipal
officials and officials of social service agencies about forms of
intergovernmental cooperation and coordination between public and
private agencies designed to advance social service programs; [(21)
develop an annual summary and analysis of community benefit
reporting by hospitals pursuant to section 19a-127k; and (22)] and (21)
receive reports from each hospital regarding its financial health
pursuant to section 19a-486j. The commissioner may require notice of
the submission of all applications by municipalities, any agency thereof,
and social service agencies, for federal and state financial assistance to
carry out social services. The commissioner shall establish state-wide
and regional advisory councils.
Sec. 77. Subsection (a) of section 19a-502 of the general statutes, as
amended by section 183 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any person establishing, conducting, managing or operating any
institution without the license required under the provisions of this
chapter or without the certificate required under the provisions of
Public Act No. 26-76 72 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
section 19a-561 shall be guilty of a class [D felony] C misdemeanor and
fined not more than [five] two thousand dollars for each day of
continuing action in violation of this chapter or section 19a-561.
Sec. 78. Subsection (b) of section 19a-503 of the general statutes, as
amended by section 184 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) The commissioner may, after a hearing held in accordance with
chapter 54, impose a civil penalty on any person establishing,
conducting, managing or operating any institution without the license
required under this chapter or without the certificate required under
section 19a-561. The amount of any such civil penalty shall not exceed
[twenty-five] five thousand dollars for each day such person is in
violation of this chapter or section 19a-561.
Sec. 79. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (3) of subsection (e) of section 10-512c of the general
statutes, any funds released by the Treasurer to the Commissioner of
Early Childhood pursuant to section 10-512b of the general statutes for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and that are not fully expended by
the end of said fiscal year shall not lapse and shall remain available to
the commissioner for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and each fiscal
year thereafter, until such funds are fully expended.
Sec. 80. Section 391 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the city of Hartford
shall be paid a supplemental education aid grant in an amount equal to
five million dollars of its grant amount listed in section 390 of [this act]
public act 26-68. The amount paid to the city of Hartford shall be paid
by the Comptroller, upon certification of the Commissioner of
Education, to the treasurer of Hartford not later than June thirtieth of
Public Act No. 26-76 73 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
said fiscal year. All aid paid to the city of Hartford pursuant to the
provisions of this subdivision shall be expended for educational
purposes only and shall be expended upon the authorization of the
board of education for Hartford. Such grant shall not be used to
supplant local funding for educational purposes.
(2) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, each town shall be paid a
supplemental education aid grant equal to the amount prescribed in
section 390 of [this act] public act 26-68. The amount due each town shall
be paid by the Comptroller, upon certification of the Commissioner of
Education, to the treasurer of each town not later than June thirtieth of
said fiscal year. All aid distributed to a town pursuant to the provisions
of this subdivision shall be expended for educational purposes only and
shall be expended upon the authorization of the local or regional board
of education. Such grant shall not be used to supplant local funding for
educational purposes. For any town paid a supplemental education aid
grant under subdivision (1) of this subsection, such amount paid shall
be deducted from the town's grant paid for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027.
(b) Such grant shall not be considered part of the budgeted
appropriation for education for the town for purposes of calculating the
minimum budget requirement for the town pursuant to section 10-262j
of the general statutes.
Sec. 81. Section 223 of public act 26-68 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Sec. 82. Subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section 362 of public act
26-68 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
from passage):
(4) If any protest or appeal is pending on the first day of the next
succeeding state fiscal year, the amounts reported by the protesting or
Public Act No. 26-76 74 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
appealing taxpayer shall be used to tentatively calculate the tax due
under this section until such protest or appeal is finally resolved. If any
amount is revised pursuant to such protest or appeal from the amount
originally reported by a hospital, the commissioner shall recalculate for
each hospital the amounts due under [this] section 12-263q of the
general statutes, as amended by section 385 of public act 26-68, and shall
issue assessments or refunds, as applicable, with respect to any affected
calendar quarter.
Sec. 83. Subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of
section 17b-239e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes, as
amended by section 363 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(3) (A) For the fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2026, the
Department of Social Services shall pay Medicaid supplemental
payments to nongovernmental hospitals located in the state for
inpatient hospital services, outpatient hospital services and hospital-
based physician and mid-level services; hospital-affiliated medical
groups; and faculty practice plans, as set forth in subparagraph (B) of
this subdivision, from the hospital supplemental payment account,
established by section 359 of public act 26-68. The commissioner shall
diligently pursue the federal approvals required for the supplemental
pools and payments set forth in this subdivision and shall make such
payments while federal approval is being pursued. During the
pendency of any request for approval to remove the exemption for
children's general hospitals under section 12-263q(b)(2), any children's
general hospital that would be eligible for payments under this
subdivision if such approval were granted shall be treated as eligible for
such payments unless and until the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services denies such request.
Sec. 84. Section 485 of public act 26-68 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Public Act No. 26-76 75 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Sec. 85. Section 263 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage and applicable to income
and taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue Services;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Revenue Services;
(3) "Income year" means the income year or taxable year, as
determined under chapter 207, 208 or 229 of the general statutes, as the
case may be;
(4) "Qualified small business" means an employer in the state that (A)
is subject to tax under chapter 207, 208 or 229 of the general statutes, (B)
employs fewer than fifty employees in the state on the date of its
application under subsection (c) of this section, and (C) has adopted an
individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement, as described in
Section 9831(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, in lieu of a traditional
employer-provided health insurance plan;
(5) "Qualified contribution" means a contribution by a qualified small
business toward a covered employee's individual coverage health
reimbursement arrangement during the income year; [and]
(6) "Covered employee" means an employee for whom the qualified
small employer made a qualified contribution toward an individual
coverage health reimbursement arrangement during the income year;
and
(7) "Exchange" means the Connecticut Health Insurance Exchange
established pursuant to section 38a-1081 of the general statutes.
(b) (1) There is established an individual coverage health
reimbursement arrangement tax credit for qualified small businesses
Public Act No. 26-76 76 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
whereby a qualified small business may be allowed a tax credit against
the taxes imposed under chapter 207, 208 or 229 of the general statutes,
other than the liability imposed by section 12-707 of the general statutes,
for participation in an individual coverage health reimbursement
arrangement through the exchange.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed for an income year shall be equal
to the lesser of: (A) The sum of qualified contributions made by the
qualified small business during the income year, or (B) one thousand
dollars per covered employee. Any tax credit not used in the income
year during which it was earned shall expire and shall not be
refundable.
(3) A credit under this section may be allowed to a qualified small
business for the first income year during which the business offered an
individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement and the
immediately succeeding income year. No credit shall be allowed for any
other income year.
(c) (1) Any qualified small business planning to claim a credit under
the provisions of this section shall apply to the commissioner, in such
form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, to reserve an
allocation for a credit based upon the qualified contributions the
business intends to make. Such application shall indicate the amount of
qualified contributions that the business intends to make in the first
income year during which it offers an individual coverage health
reimbursement arrangement and the immediately succeeding income
year. The application shall contain such information as the
commissioner deems necessary to administer the provisions of this
section.
(2) The commissioner shall approve applications for the reservation
of a credit on a first-come, first-served basis and shall notify the
qualified small business in writing not later than thirty days after the
Public Act No. 26-76 77 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
date of receipt of an application of the commissioner's approval or
rejection of the application. If the commissioner approves the
application of the qualified small business, the commissioner shall issue
a certification letter indicating the amount of the tax credit that has been
reserved for such business during each of the two income years for
which it is eligible to claim the credit. A qualified small business may
not claim a credit under this section in excess of the amount reserved by
the commissioner.
(3) The total amount of tax credits reserved under this section shall
not exceed five million dollars for any income year.
(4) The commissioner shall provide a copy of each certification letter
issued pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection to the Connecticut
Health Insurance Exchange. The commissioner and the chief executive
officer of the exchange may also enter into a memorandum of
understanding to share any additional information, including returns
and return information as such terms are defined in section 12-15 of the
general statutes, with each other to facilitate the administration of the
credit available under this section. Any return or return information
disclosed by the commissioner shall not be redisclosed by the recipient
to a third party without permission from the commissioner and shall
only be used by the exchange in the manner prescribed in the
memorandum of understanding.
(d) If the qualified small business is an S corporation or an entity
treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, the tax credit
may be claimed by the shareholders or partners of the qualified small
business. If the qualified small business is a single member limited
liability company that is disregarded as an entity separate from its
owner, the tax credit may be claimed by the limited liability company's
owner.
Sec. 86. (Effective from passage) Up to $500,000 of the unexpended
Public Act No. 26-76 78 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by public act 26-68, to the Department of Economic and
Community Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, for High Poverty Community Leadership Development,
shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made
available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for leadership
development of a community development corporation and the
operations of such corporation in Hartford's South End.
Sec. 87. Section 43 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Up to [$100,000] $200,000 of the unexpended balance of funds
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by [this act]
public act 26-68, to the Judicial Department, for Youth Services
Prevention, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on
June 30, 2026, and shall be transferred to the Department of Economic
and Community Development, for Various Grants, and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to My
Architecture Workshops.
Sec. 88. Section 51 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Up to [$25,000] $90,000 of the unexpended balance of funds
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by [this act]
public act 26-68, to the Department of Education, for Other Expenses,
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026,
and shall be carried forward and made available during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Burns Latino Academy for
musical instruments and instruction.
Sec. 89. Section 15-120h of the general statutes, as amended by section
166 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in
Public Act No. 26-76 79 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) "Airport project" means any acquisition, disposition, demolition,
remediation, construction, renovation, repair, replacement, expansion,
environmental remediation or other development of real property or
improvements that is related to an airport facility or access to an airport
facility, including (A) the acquisition of off-airport land required by a
permitting agency, (B) for purposes of a runway, a taxilane, a hanger, a
depot, an apron, a mezzanine, baggage handling, administration,
maintenance, storage, utilities or parking, (C) furniture, fixtures,
equipment, communication, navigation, safety infrastructure and
systems and other personal property which is reasonably necessary to
acquire in connection with such development, and (D) associated
interest, reserve fund deposits and other financing costs and charges
necessary or incident to the development, financing, completion and
placement in operation of any airport project, owned in its entirety by
the authority, or suitable for use by the authority, in accordance with the
purposes of the authority;
(2) "Authority" means the Tweed-New Haven Airport Authority, as
created under section 15-120i;
(3) "Bonds" means bonds of the authority issued under the provisions
of this chapter, including refunding bonds, which may be secured by
mortgages or the full faith and credit of the authority, the full faith and
credit of a participating corporation or any other lawfully pledged
security of the authority or a participating corporation, which may
include, but need not be limited to, the revenues from the airport or a
financing project.
(4) "Cost" in relation to an airport project or any portion of an airport
Public Act No. 26-76 80 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
project financed under the provision of this chapter, includes all or any
part of the cost of (A) construction and acquisition of all lands,
structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises,
easements, permits, licenses and other interests of any kind which may
be owned, held, possessed, transferred, assigned or otherwise acquired
or used for an airport project, including the acquisition of off-airport
land; (B) demolishing, renovation, expanding or removing any
buildings or other structures on acquired land, including the cost of
acquiring land upon which such buildings or structures may be moved;
(C) environmental remediation; (D) all machinery, equipment, repairs
or improvements to other public or private property or infrastructure
that is necessary for, incident to or a condition for, the construction,
placement, operation or use of airport infrastructure; (E) the payment of
offset, impact or compensatory fees or payments for the use of,
modifications to or disruption of, public or private properties, adverse
impact upon the environment or the health, safety or welfare of the
general public, finance charges, interest prior to, during and for a period
after, completion of construction, working capital, reserves for principal
and interest, extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements,
renovations and improvements; (F) engineering, financial and legal
services, designs, plans, studies, surveys, inspections, testing,
regulatory compliance and certifications, estimates of cost and of
revenues, project management, administrative expense, expenses
necessary to determine the feasibility or practicability of constructing
the airport project; and (G) other expenses necessary or incident to the
construction, acquisition, financing or operation of the airport project;
(5) "Federally guaranteed security" means any security, investment
or evidence of indebtedness which is either directly or indirectly insured
or guaranteed, in whole or in part, concerning the payment of principal
and interest by the United States or any agency or instrumentality
thereof;
Public Act No. 26-76 81 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(6) "Financing project" means (A) an airport project, (B) the leasing,
licensing [,] or operation of an airport project, and (C) any other activity
or property for which the authority is authorized to issue bonds or
provide financing under the provisions of this chapter;
(7) "Participating corporation" means any corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited
partnership, nonprofit organization, specially chartered corporation or
similar type of legal business entity, quasi-public authority or
governmental entity;
(8) "Procedure" means each statement, by the authority, of general
applicability, without regard to its designation, that implements or
prescribes law or policy or describes the organization or procedure of
the authority. [, including, but not limited to, bylaws.] "Procedure"
includes the amendment or repeal of a prior regulation, but does not
include, unless otherwise provided by any provision of the general
statutes, (A) statements concerning only the internal management of the
authority and not affecting procedures available to the public, and (B)
intra-authority memoranda;
(9) "Proposed procedure" means a proposal by the authority under
the provisions of section 15-120k for a new procedure or for a change in,
addition to or repeal of an existing procedure.
Sec. 90. Section 167 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, upon
certification by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management to
the Treasurer that the town of East Haven has approved a building
permit for a passenger terminal facility located on the East Haven side
of the Tweed-New Haven Airport [that is adjacent to the town of East
Haven] and designed to support scheduled and charter commercial
Public Act No. 26-76 82 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
airline flights, including no fewer than two thousand one hundred
parking spaces, [has opened and is operational] but not earlier than July
1, 2027, and annually thereafter until such passenger terminal facility
ceases to operate, the Treasurer shall make the following payments in
lieu of taxes on behalf of the state:
(1) Four million four hundred thousand dollars to the town of East
Haven; and
(2) Two million nine hundred thousand dollars to the city of New
Haven.
(b) The payments made pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall
be in addition to any state grant in lieu of taxes otherwise payable to the
town of East Haven or the city of New Haven pursuant to any provision
of the general statutes.
Sec. 91. Section 15-120i of the general statutes, as amended by section
168 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in
lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is created a body politic and corporate to be known as the
"Tweed-New Haven Airport Authority". Said authority shall be a public
instrumentality and political subdivision of this state and the exercise
by the authority of the powers conferred by sections 15-120g to 15-120o,
inclusive, shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential
public and governmental function. The Tweed-New Haven Airport
Authority shall not be construed to be a department, institution or
agency of the state.
(b) (1) The authority shall be governed by a board of directors
consisting of fifteen members, each member serving not more than two
consecutive four-year terms. The terms of the members shall be
staggered so that not more than four members' terms shall expire at the
same time.
Public Act No. 26-76 83 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(2) Until thirty days after the issuance of a building permit in
accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection, the membership of
the board shall be appointed as follows: Eight members of the board
shall be appointed by the mayor of New Haven and five members shall
be appointed by the mayor of East Haven, at least six of whom shall be
residents of New Haven or East Haven. Two members of the board shall
be appointed by the South Central Regional Council of Governments,
each of whom shall be a resident of any of the following towns or cities:
Bethany, Branford, Guilford, Hamden, Madison, Milford, North
Branford, North Haven, Orange, Wallingford, West Haven or
Woodbridge.
(3) Thirty days after the issuance by the local building official and fire
marshal of a building permit to construct a passenger terminal facility
located on the East Haven side of the Tweed-New Haven Airport [that
is adjacent to the town of East Haven] and designed to support
scheduled and charter commercial airline flights, including no fewer
than two thousand one hundred parking spaces, the membership of the
board shall be appointed as follows: Eight members of the board shall
be appointed by the mayor of New Haven and seven members shall be
appointed by the mayor of East Haven, at least six of whom shall be
residents of New Haven or East Haven. Any member appointed by the
South Central Regional Council of Governments pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection and serving at the time of the issuance
of such permit shall continue to serve until [such time as] the initial
appointment of the two additional members appointed by the mayor of
East Haven under this subdivision, at which time the terms of the
members appointed by the South Central Regional Council of
Governments shall terminate.
(4) The fifteen members of the board of directors appointed by the
mayors of New Haven and East Haven shall be special directors vested
with additional powers set forth in the bylaws of the Tweed-New Haven
Public Act No. 26-76 84 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Airport Authority.
(c) The board of directors shall elect a chairperson from among its
members and shall annually elect one of its members as vice-
chairperson and shall elect other members as officers, and establish
bylaws as necessary for the operation of the authority. Members of the
board of directors shall receive no compensation for the performance of
their duties. No member of the board shall have any financial interest in
Tweed-New Haven Airport or any of its tenants or concessions.
(d) The powers of the authority shall be vested in and exercised by
the board. Eight members of the board shall constitute a quorum and
the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting
of the board shall be sufficient for any action taken by the board, except
as provided in subsection (e) of this section and sections 15-120j and 15-
120k. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right
of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the
board. Any action taken by the board may be authorized by resolution
at any regular or special meeting and shall take effect immediately
unless otherwise provided in the resolution. Notice of any meeting,
whether special or regular, shall be given orally, not less than forty-eight
hours prior to the meeting. The board may delegate to three or more of
its members, or its officers, agents and employees, such board powers
and duties as it may deem proper.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of the general statutes, upon
the issuance of a building permit to construct a passenger terminal
facility located on the East Haven side of the Tweed-New Haven Airport
[that is adjacent to the town of East Haven] and designed to support
scheduled and charter commercial airline flights, including no fewer
than two thousand one hundred parking spaces, the following actions
shall require the affirmative vote of at least ten members of the board,
unless such actions are required to comply with applicable federal law,
including mandatory conditions of grants of the Federal Aviation
Public Act No. 26-76 85 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Administration, the airport operating certificate, safety or security
directives or any action necessary to maintain safe airport operations:
(1) Any extension of Runway 2-20 of the airport exceeding six
thousand six hundred thirty-five linear feet;
(2) Construction of any new facility, or the structural conversion of
any existing airport facility, for the purpose of providing or enabling
freight and cargo services;
(3) Any expansion project that increases the operational capacity,
passenger capacity, gate or landing position capacity or increases use of
airport facilities within the town of East Haven, excluding any project
that is part of, and consistent with, the terminal expansion project
approved by the authority prior to such permit issuance, including all
associated supporting infrastructure necessary to complete such
terminal expansion project;
(4) Any addition, material modification or closing of any airport
entrances or exits;
(5) Any lease agreement or renewal of a lease agreement pertaining
to general aviation services, including the addition of any fixed base
operations;
(6) Any amendment to provisions of a lease or other agreement or
renewal of a lease or other agreement, for private operation or
management of the airport that would impact (A) cargo or freight
operations, the construction of a facility or modification of existing
facilities to accommodate such operations, (B) community benefits,
including, but not limited to, mitigation payments paid by the private
operator, (C) operation of parking at the West Terminal and access to
such terminal, and (D) the acquisition of additional property; [and]
(7) The repeal or reduction of noise mitigation or abatement measures
Public Act No. 26-76 86 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
previously approved by the board; and
(8) Any amendments to the bylaws of the authority.
(f) The authority shall have perpetual succession and shall adopt
procedures for the conduct of its affairs in accordance with section 15-
120k. Such succession shall continue as long as the authority shall have
obligations outstanding and until the existence of the authority is
terminated by law at which time the rights and properties of the
authority shall pass to and be vested in the city of New Haven.
Sec. 92. Section 15-120j of the general statutes, as amended by section
169 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in
lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The authority shall maintain and improve Tweed-New Haven
Airport as an important economic development asset for the south
central Connecticut region which is comprised of the towns and cities of
Bethany, Branford, East Haven, Guilford, Hamden, Madison, Milford,
New Haven, North Branford, North Haven, Orange, Wallingford, West
Haven and Woodbridge. The authority shall have the following powers
and duties and may exercise such powers in its own name:
(1) To manage, maintain, supervise and operate Tweed-New Haven
Airport and any improvements or additions made to such airport from
time to time under this chapter;
(2) To do all things necessary to maintain working relationships with
the state, municipalities and persons, and conduct the business of a
regional airport, in accordance with applicable statutes and regulations;
(3) To charge reasonable fees for the services it performs and modify,
reduce or increase such fees, provided fees shall apply uniformly to all
airport users;
Public Act No. 26-76 87 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(4) To enter into contracts, leases and agreements for goods and
equipment and for services with airlines, concessions, counsel,
engineers, architects, private consultants and advisors;
(5) To contract for the construction, reconstruction, enlargement or
alteration of airport projects with private persons and firms in
accordance with such terms and conditions as the authority shall
determine;
(6) To make plans and studies in conjunction with the Federal
Aviation Administration or other state or federal agencies;
(7) To apply for and receive grant funds for airport purposes;
(8) To plan and enter into contracts with municipalities, the state,
businesses and other entities to finance the operations and debt of the
airport, including compensation to the host municipalities of New
Haven and East Haven for the use of the land occupied by the airport;
(9) To borrow funds for airport purposes for such consideration and
upon such terms as the authority may determine to be reasonable;
(10) To employ a staff necessary to carry out its functions and
purposes and fix the duties, compensation and benefits of such staff;
(11) To issue and sell bonds and to use the proceeds of such bonds for
capital improvements to the airport and to provide for the financing of
financing projects, and to fund or refund such projects;
(12) To acquire, lease and sell property for airport purposes, subject
to applicable requirements of federal law and regulation;
(13) To own, operate, lease, assign, pledge, sell or dispose of personal
property of any kind for airport purposes, including, but not limited to,
securities, rights and privileges in contract or at law, insurance, security
and trade fixtures;
Public Act No. 26-76 88 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(14) To operate the authority, subject to applicable requirements of
federal law and regulation;
[(14)] (15) To fix, revise from time to time, charge and collect rates,
rents, fees and charges for the use of and services furnished or to be
furnished by a financing project or a portion of a financing project and
to enter into a contract with any person or participating corporation,
public or private, concerning such financing project;
[(15)] (16) To make loans to any participating corporation for
purposes of providing financing for a financing project in accordance
with any agreement between the authority and such corporation;
[(16)] (17) To acquire and agree to acquire any federally guaranteed
security and pledge or use such security in a manner that the authority
determines in its best interest to secure or as a source of repayment on
any of its bonds, notes or other obligation or to agree to make a loan to
a participating corporation for purposes of acquiring any federally
guaranteed security;
[(17)] (18) To enter into any contract or series of contracts that the
authority deems to be necessary or appropriate concerning the bonds,
notes or other obligations of the authority;
[(18)] (19) To prepare and issue budgets, reports, procedures, audits
and such other materials as may be necessary and desirable to its
purposes;
[(19)] (20) To accept from any public agency, as defined in section 1-
200, insurance, loans or grants for purposes of a financing project or any
portion of such project and to receive loans, grants or other assistance,
including money, property or services, from any source provided any
such assistance is used only for the purposes which such assistance is
granted;
Public Act No. 26-76 89 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
[(20)] (21) To invest any funds not needed for immediate use or
disbursement, in reserve funds, federally guaranteed securities or in the
state, including the Short Term Investment Fund created under section
3-27a, Medium-Term Investment Fund created under section 3-28a or
other securities, obligations or investments described in a trust
agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of [bond funds]
bonds;
[(21)] (22) To charge and equitably apportion administrative costs
and expenses incurred by the authority in the exercise of the powers and
duties of the authority among participating corporations; and
[(22] (23) To exercise all other powers granted to such an authority by
law.
(b) The authority shall have full control of the operation and
management of the airport, including land, buildings and easements by
means of a lease to the authority by the city of New Haven and the town
of East Haven.
(c) The authority may undertake a financing project for two or more
participating corporations jointly and may structure such financing as a
single project or as related components thereof. In such cases, all
provisions of this section and sections 15-120h to 15-120o, inclusive,
shall apply to and for the benefit of the authority and such participating
corporations.
Sec. 93. Section 15-120l of the general statutes, as amended by section
170 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in
lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The board of directors of the authority is authorized from time to
time to issue its bonds, notes and other obligations in such principal
amounts as in the opinion of the board shall be necessary to provide
sufficient funds for carrying out the purposes set forth in sections 15-
Public Act No. 26-76 90 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
120g to 15-120o, inclusive, including the payment, funding or refunding
of the principal of, or interest or redemption premiums on, any bonds,
notes and other obligations issued by it whether the bonds, notes or
other obligations or interest to be funded or refunded have or have not
become due, the establishment of reserves to secure such bonds, notes
and other obligations and all other expenditures of the authority
incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes set
forth in said sections. In anticipation of the sale of such bonds, the
authority may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes and may renew
the same from time to time. Such notes shall be paid from any revenues
of the authority or other moneys available to the authority and not
otherwise pledged, or from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds of the
authority in anticipation of which they were issued. Such notes and any
resolution authorizing such notes may contain any provisions,
conditions or limitations that a resolution authorizing bonds may
contain.
(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in sections 15-120g to 15-
120o, inclusive, or by the board, every issue of bonds, notes or other
obligations, shall be a general obligation of the authority payable out of
any moneys or revenues of the authority subject only to any agreements
with the holders of particular bonds, notes or other obligations pledging
any particular moneys or revenues, which may be subject to any
applicable agreements with a participating corporation for any bonds
issued on behalf of a participating corporation. Any such bonds, notes
or other obligations may be additionally secured by any grant or
contributions from any department, agency or instrumentality of the
United States or person or a pledge of any moneys, income or revenues
of the authority from any source whatsoever. Bonds issued by the
authority under the provisions of this chapter are securities (1) in which
all public officers and public bodies of the state and the political
subdivisions of the state, insurance companies, state banks and trust
companies, national banking associations, savings banks, savings and
Public Act No. 26-76 91 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
loan associations, investment companies, executors, administrators,
trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds,
and (2) which may properly and legally be deposited with and received
by any state or municipal officer, state agency or political subdivision of
the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations
of the state is authorized by law.
(c) Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any
bonds, notes or other obligations issued by the authority pursuant to
sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, shall be fully negotiable within
the meaning and for all purposes of title 42a. Any such bonds, notes or
other obligations shall be legal investments for all trust companies,
banks, investment companies, savings banks, building and loan
associations, executors, administrators, guardians, conservators,
trustees and other fiduciaries and pension, profit-sharing and
retirement funds.
(d) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority shall be
authorized by resolution of the board of directors of the authority and
may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates,
mature at such time or times, in the case of any such bond or note, or
any renewal thereof, not exceeding the term of years as the board shall
determine from the date of the original issue of such bond or notes, bear
interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations,
be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or
registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such
manner, be payable in any lawful money of the United States at such
place or places within or without this state, and be subject to such terms
of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or
resolutions may provide.
(e) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority may be sold at
public or private sale at such price or prices as the authority shall
determine. The board may by resolution delegate to the chairperson or
Public Act No. 26-76 92 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
vice-chairperson of the board, the executive director or another officer
of the authority the power to fix the date of sale of bonds, to receive bids
or proposals, to award and sell bonds and to take all other necessary
actions to sell and deliver bonds. The exercise of such delegated powers
[shall] may be subject to the approval of the board in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (d) of section 15-120i. The authority may
issue interim receipts or certificates while preparing the definitive bonds
and shall exchange such receipts or certificates for the definitive bonds.
(f) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority may be refunded
and renewed from time to time as may be determined by resolution of
the board, provided any such refunding or renewal shall be in
conformity with any rights of the holders thereof.
(g) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority issued under the
provisions of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, shall not be deemed
to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision
thereof other than the authority or a pledge of the faith and credit of the
state or of any such political subdivision other than the authority, and
shall not constitute bonds or notes issued or guaranteed by the state
within the meaning of section 3-21, but shall be payable solely from the
funds herein provided therefor. All such bonds, notes or other
obligations shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that
neither the state of Connecticut nor any political subdivision thereof
other than the authority shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest
thereof except from revenues or other funds of the authority and that
neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state of
Connecticut or of any political subdivision thereof other than the
authority is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on
such bonds, notes or other obligations. The authority may issue revenue
bonds for the benefit of a participating corporation in accordance with
the provisions of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, provided [there
is an agreement with the holder of such bonds that in no event shall the]
Public Act No. 26-76 93 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
such revenue bonds and the trust agreement or resolution for such
revenue bonds state that the authority shall not be liable for the
repayment of such revenue bonds from any revenue or assets of the
authority other than any assets pledged for such bonds, regardless of
whether such assets shall revert to the authority.
(h) Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, notes or other
obligations may contain provisions, except as expressly limited in
sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, and except as otherwise limited
by existing agreements with the holders of bonds, notes or other
obligations, that shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof,
as to the following:
(1) The pledging of the full faith and credit of the authority, the full
faith and credit of any participating corporation, all or any part of the
revenues of a financing project or any revenue-producing contract made
by the authority with any participating corporation, any federally
guaranteed security and moneys received therefrom purchased with
bond proceeds or all or any part of any other property, revenues, funds
or legally available moneys to secure the payment of the principal of
and interest on any bonds, notes or other obligations or of any issue
thereof;
(2) The pledging of all or part of the assets of the authority to secure
the payment of the principal and interest on any bonds, notes or other
obligations or of any issue thereof, including rental fees and other
charges, and the amounts to be raised during each year, and the use and
disposition of the revenues;
(3) The establishment of reserves or sinking funds, the making of
charges and fees to provide for the same, and the regulation and
disposition thereof;
(4) Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of bonds,
Public Act No. 26-76 94 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
notes or other obligations may be applied and pledging such proceeds
to secure the payment of the bonds, notes or other obligations, or of any
issues thereof;
(5) Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, notes or other
obligations; the terms upon which additional bonds, bond anticipation
notes or other obligations may be issued and secured and the refunding
or purchase of outstanding bonds, notes or other obligations of the
authority;
(6) The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with the
holders of any bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority may be
amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds, notes or other obligations
the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which
such consent may be given;
(7) Limitations on the amount of moneys derived from the financing
project to be expended for operating, administrative or other expenses
of the authority;
(8) The vesting in a trustee or trustees of such property, rights, powers
and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may include
any or all of the rights, powers and duties of any trustee appointed by
the holders of any bonds, notes or other obligations and limiting or
abrogating the right of the holders of any bonds, notes or other
obligations of the authority to appoint a trustee under this chapter or
limiting the rights, powers and duties of such trustee;
(9) Provision for a trust agreement by and between the authority and
a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the
powers of a trust company within or without the state, which agreement
may provide for the pledging or assigning of any assets or income from
assets to which or in which the authority has any rights or interest, and
may further provide for such other rights and remedies exercisable by
Public Act No. 26-76 95 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
the trustee as may be proper for the protection of the holders of any
bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority and not otherwise in
violation of law. Such trust agreement, resolution providing for the
issuance of such bonds or other instrument of the authority may secure
such bonds by a pledge or assignment of any revenues to be received,
any contract or the proceeds of any contract or any other property,
revenues, moneys or funds available to the authority for such purpose.
Such agreement may provide for the restriction of the rights of any
individual holder of bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority
or a financing project. All expenses incurred in carrying out the
provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part
of the cost of operation of the authority or of a financing project. The
trust agreement may contain any further provisions which are
reasonable to delineate further the respective rights, duties, safeguards,
responsibilities and liabilities of the authority; individual and collective
holders of bonds, notes and other obligations of the authority and the
trustees;
(10) Covenants to do or refrain from doing such acts and things as
may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to better secure
any bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority, or which, in the
discretion of the authority, will tend to make any bonds, notes or other
obligations to be issued more marketable notwithstanding that such
covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated in this section;
(11) Provisions permitting any participating corporation to enter into
a leasehold mortgage of its leasehold interest in any financing project
and the site thereof or to pledge or assign a loan agreement, conditional
sale agreement, sale agreement or lease for the benefit of the holders of
any bonds issued to finance such financing project; and
(12) Any other matters of like or different character, which in any way
affect the security or protection of the bonds, notes or other obligations.
All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter shall
Public Act No. 26-76 96 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this
chapter and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the authority
under this section beyond the extent to which moneys have been
provided in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(i) Any pledge made by the authority of income, revenues, or other
property shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made,
and shall constitute a pledge within the meaning and for all purposes of
title 42a. The income, revenue, or other property so pledged and
thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the
lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act,
and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all
parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against
the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.
(j) The board of directors of the authority may obtain from any
department, agency or instrumentality of the United States any
insurance or guarantee as to, or of or for the payment or repayment of,
interest or principal, or both, or any part thereof, on any bonds, notes or
other obligations issued by the authority pursuant to the provisions of
sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, and, notwithstanding any other
provisions of said sections, to enter into any agreement, contract or any
other instrument whatsoever with respect to any such insurance or
guarantee except to the extent that such action would in any way impair
or interfere with the authority's ability to perform and fulfill the terms
of any agreement made with the holders of the bonds, bond anticipation
notes or other obligations of the authority.
(k) Neither the members of the board of directors of the authority nor
any person executing bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority
issued pursuant to sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, shall be liable
personally on such bonds, notes or other obligations or be subject to any
personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof, nor
shall any director or employee of the authority be personally liable for
Public Act No. 26-76 97 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
damage or injury, not wanton, reckless, wilful or malicious, caused in
the performance of his duties and within the scope of his employment
or appointment as such director, officer or employee. The authority shall
protect, save harmless and indemnify its directors, officers or employees
from financial loss and expense, including legal fees and costs, if any,
arising out of any claim, demand, suit or judgment by reason of alleged
negligence or alleged deprivation of any person's civil rights or any
other act or omission resulting in damage or injury, if the director,
officer or employee is found to have been acting in the discharge of his
duties or within the scope of his employment and such act or omission
is found not to have been wanton, reckless, wilful or malicious.
(l) The board of directors of the authority shall have power to
purchase bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority out of any
funds available therefor. The authority may hold, cancel or resell such
bonds, notes or other obligations subject to and in accordance with
agreements with holders of its bonds, notes and other obligations.
(m) All moneys received pursuant to the authority of sections 15-120g
to 15-120o, inclusive, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as
revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely
as provided in said sections. Any officer with whom, or any bank or
trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as
trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the
purposes of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, subject to such
regulations as said sections and the resolution authorizing the bonds of
any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds may provide.
(n) Any holder of bonds, notes or other obligations issued under the
provisions of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, and the trustee or
trustees under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein
given may be restricted by any resolution authorizing the issuance of,
or any such trust agreement securing, such bonds, may, either at law or
in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and
Public Act No. 26-76 98 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted
hereunder or under such resolution or trust agreement, and may enforce
and compel the performance of all duties required by said sections or by
such resolution or trust agreement to be performed by the authority or
by any officer, employee or agent thereof, including the fixing, charging
and collecting of the rates, rents, fees and charges herein authorized and
required by the provisions of such resolution or trust agreement to be
fixed, established and collected.
(o) The authority may make representations and agreements for the
benefit of the holders of any bonds, notes or other obligations of the state
which are necessary or appropriate to ensure the exclusion from gross
income for federal income tax purposes of interest on bonds, notes or
other obligations of the state from taxation under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of
the United States, as from time to time amended, including agreement
to pay rebates to the federal government of investment earnings derived
from the investment of the proceeds of the bonds, notes or other
obligations of the authority. Any such agreement may include: (1) A
covenant to pay rebates to the federal government of investment
earnings derived from the investment of the proceeds of the bonds,
notes or other obligations of the authority, (2) a covenant that the
authority will not limit or alter its rebate obligations until its obligations
to the holders or owners of such bonds, notes or other obligations are
finally met and discharged, and (3) provisions to (A) establish trust and
other accounts which may be appropriate to carry out such
representations and agreements, (B) retain fiscal agents as depositories
for such fund and accounts and (C) provide that such fiscal agents may
act as trustee of such funds and accounts.
(p) Authority rates, rents, fees and charges shall be fixed and adjusted
considering the aggregate of rates, rents, fees and charges from such
financing project in order to provide funds sufficient with other
Public Act No. 26-76 99 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
revenues or moneys available therefor, if any, to (1) pay the cost of
maintaining, repairing and operating the financing project and each and
every portion thereof, to the extent that the payment of such cost has not
otherwise been adequately provided for, (2) pay the principal of and the
interest on outstanding bonds of the authority issued for such financing
project as the same shall become due and payable, and (3) create and
maintain reserves required or provided for in any resolution
authorizing, or trust agreement securing, such bonds of the authority.
Such rates, rents, fees and charges shall not be subject to supervision or
regulation by any department, commission, board, body, bureau or
agency of this state other than the authority.
(q) A sufficient amount of the revenues derived in respect of a
financing project, except such part of such revenues as may be necessary
to pay the cost of maintenance, repair and operation and to provide
reserves and for renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements and
improvements as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the
issuance of any bonds of the authority or in the trust agreement securing
the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided
in such resolution or trust agreement in a sinking or other similar fund
which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the
principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become
due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by
call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and
binding from the time when the pledge is made and the rates, rents, fees
and charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and
thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the
lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act,
and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all
parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against
the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.
Notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Commercial Code,
neither the resolution, any trust agreement, other agreement nor any
Public Act No. 26-76 100 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
lease by which a pledge is created needs to be filed or recorded except
in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the
credit of such sinking or other similar fund shall be subject to the
provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or
of such trust agreement. Unless otherwise provided in such resolution
or such trust agreement, such resolution or trust agreement may permit
the issuance of bonds having a subordinate lien in respect of the security
authorized in this section to other bonds of the authority, and, in such
case, the authority may create separate sinking or other similar funds in
respect of such subordinate lien bonds.
(r) The authority may issue bonds, notes or other obligations under
this section (1) the interest on which may be includable in the gross
income of the holder or holders thereof under the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the
United States, as amended from time to time, and (2) that may be eligible
for tax credits or exemptions or payments from the federal government,
or any other desired federal income tax treatment of such bonds, notes
or other obligations. Any such bonds, notes or other obligations may be
issued only upon a finding by the authority that such issuance is
necessary, is in the public interest, and is in furtherance of the purposes
and powers of the authority. The state hereby consents to such inclusion
only for the bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority so
authorized.
(s) The authority may provide for the issuance of bonds of the
authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds of the authority then
outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium
thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the earliest or
subsequent date of redemption, purchase or maturity of such bonds.
The proceeds of any such bonds issued for the purpose of refunding
outstanding bonds may, in the discretion of the authority, be applied to
the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of such
Public Act No. 26-76 101 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption
date or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof and may, pending
such application, be placed in escrow to be applied to such purchase or
retirement at maturity or redemption on such date as may be
determined by the authority. Any such escrowed proceeds, pending
such use, may be invested and reinvested in federally guaranteed
securities and certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by direct
obligations of, or obligations unconditionally guaranteed by, the United
States, or obligations of a state, a territory, or a possession of the United
States, or any political subdivision of such state, territory or possession,
or of the District of Columbia, within the meaning of Section 103(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding
internal revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to
time, the full and timely payment of the principal of and interest on
which are secured by an irrevocable deposit of federally guaranteed
securities, maturing at such time or times as shall be appropriate to
assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest and redemption
premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The
interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on any such
investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding
bonds to be so refunded.
(t) The authority may contract with the holders of any of its bonds or
notes for the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of
any reserve funds of the authority, or of any moneys held in trust or
otherwise for the payment of bonds or notes, and to carry out such
contracts. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with
which, such moneys are deposited as trustee thereof shall hold, invest,
reinvest and apply such moneys for the purposes thereof, subject to such
provisions as this chapter and the resolution authorizing the issue of the
bonds or notes or the trust agreement securing such bonds or notes may
provide.
Public Act No. 26-76 102 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Sec. 94. Section 32-75d of the general statutes, as amended by section
173 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in
lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established an airport development zone, which is
comprised of the following census blocks as assigned on October 1, 2011,
in the towns of Windsor Locks, Suffield, East Granby and Windsor:
090034701001022, 090034701003000, 090034701003001,
090034701003002, 090034701003003, 090034701003004,
090034701003005, 090034701003017, 090034701003018,
090034701003019, 090034701003020, 090034701003021,
090034701003025, 090034701003026, 090034735022009,
090034735022010, 090034735022011, 090034735022012,
090034735022013, 090034735025004, 090034735027000,
090034735029000, 090034735029001, 090034735029002,
090034735029003, 090034735029004, 090034735029006,
090034761009000, 090034761009010, 090034761009011,
090034761009012, 090034761009013, 090034762001023,
090034762001025, 090034762002009, 090034762002013,
090034763003004, 090034763009000, 090034763009001,
090034763009002, 090034763009003, 090034763009004,
090034763009005, 090034763009006, 090034763009007,
090034763009008, 090034763009009, 090034763009010,
090034763009011, 090034763009012, 090034763009013,
090034763009014, 090034763009015, 090034763009016,
090034763009017, 090034763009018, 090034763009020,
090034763009021, 090034763009022, 090034763009023,
090034763009024, 090034763009025, 090034763009026,
090034763009031, 090034763009033, 090034771014005,
090034771014011, 090034771014012, 090034771014013,
090034771014014, 090034771014017, 090034771014018,
090034771014019, 090034771014020, 090034771023025,
090034771023026, 090034771023027, 090034771023036,
090034701003006, 090034701003022, 090034701003023,
090034701005000, 090034761001039, 090034763009028.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
the Commissioner of Economic and Community Development may
Public Act No. 26-76 103 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
establish additional airport development zones surrounding any of the
general aviation airports, as defined in section 15-120aa, or any other
airport within the duty, power and authority of the Connecticut Airport
Authority, as defined in section 15-120cc, upon receipt from one or more
interested municipalities of a proposal recommending the
establishment of such a zone.
(1) The commissioner shall consider any such proposal if the
commissioner determines that the economic development benefits of
establishing a new airport development zone outweigh the anticipated
costs to the state and the affected municipalities. Any such proposal
shall comply with the state plan of conservation and development
adopted pursuant to chapter 297.
(2) A proposal submitted to the commissioner shall include, but not
be limited to, an identification of:
(A) The geographical scope of such proposed zone, including
designation of all census blocks that are proposed to be incorporated
into such zone, provided (i) each zone shall be in accordance with the
applicable general aviation airport or other airport's master plan, and
(ii) no zone shall extend beyond a two-mile radius of the applicable
general aviation airport or other airport without approval of the General
Assembly;
(B) The economic development benefits anticipated from the
establishment of such zone, including the nature of business and
industry that will be developed and the anticipated number of jobs
created; and
(C) The anticipated costs of establishing such zone.
(3) The commissioner may modify the geographic scope of the
proposed zone to improve, within the commissioner's discretion, the
balance between the anticipated economic benefit and the cost to the
Public Act No. 26-76 104 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
state and affected municipalities.
(4) The commissioner may approve the establishment of a new
airport development zone.
(5) An airport development zone established pursuant to this
subsection shall not include the land on which any general aviation
airport or other airport operates, including any state-owned or
controlled land.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section, the Commissioner of Economic and Community Development
shall establish an airport development zone surrounding [Tweed New]
Tweed-New Haven Airport upon a proposal submitted by the town of
East Haven [or] for census tracts within said town, by the city of New
Haven for census tracts within said city or jointly by both said town and
city for census tracts within said town and city.
(2) Any such proposal shall comply with the state plan of
conservation and development adopted pursuant to chapter 297 and
shall include, but need not be limited to, an identification of:
(A) The geographical scope of such proposed zone, including
designation of all census blocks that are proposed to be incorporated
into such zone, provided such zone shall be in accordance with the
master plan of [Tweed New] Tweed-New Haven Airport and shall not
extend beyond a two-mile radius of said airport without approval of the
General Assembly;
(B) The economic development benefits anticipated from the
establishment of such zone, including the nature of business and
industry that will be developed and the anticipated number of jobs
created; and
(C) The anticipated costs of establishing such zone.
Public Act No. 26-76 105 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
(3) The commissioner may modify the geographic scope of the
proposed zone to improve, within the commissioner's discretion, the
balance between the anticipated economic benefit and the cost to the
state and affected municipalities.
(4) An airport development zone established pursuant to this
subsection shall not include the land on which the [Tweed New] Tweed-
New Haven Airport operates, including any state-owned or controlled
land.
Sec. 95. Subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 19a-754g of the
general statutes, as amended by section 365 of public act 26-68, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(2) Before finalizing the methodology, the secretary shall provide
each hospital with its hospital-specific preliminary results based on the
prior year's data, the data and assumptions used to calculate such
results and a period of not less than ninety days to validate, verify or
challenge such methodology, data, assumptions and preliminary
results. The secretary shall consider all timely corrections or challenges
submitted by a hospital and shall amend the methodology or
preliminary results as appropriate.
Sec. 96. Sections 132 to 137, inclusive, of public act 26-68 are repealed.
(Effective from passage)
Sec. 97. Subdivision (2) of subsection (h) of section 19a-754g of the
general statutes, as amended by section 365 of public act 26-68, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(2) Adopt and make available on the office's Internet web site a
revised methodology for assessing compliance with the health care cost
growth benchmark. Such methodology shall assess cost growth for each
Public Act No. 26-76 106 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
provider entity [and hospital] in the aggregate across governmental and
private payers and shall adjust for clinical risk, and account for changes
in payment methodologies that have a material change on cost growth
measures; and
Sec. 98. Subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of section 19a-754g of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes, as amended by section 365 of
public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(3) Not later than January 1, 2029, the secretary shall publish the final
hospital payment growth methodology on the office's Internet web site,
together with a written response to material comments received, a
description of any changes made to the methodology, to the extent
feasible and practicable, following testing and validation and an
explanation of how the methodology accounts for material changes in
patient acuity, clinical complexity, severity of illness, case mix, service
intensity, payer mix, service mix, coding guidance, payer claims
adjudication practices and services provided.
Sec. 99. Section 224 of public act 25-174, as amended by section 379 of
public act 26-68, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, six million [two hundred
fifty] four hundred ten thousand dollars of the Magnet Schools
appropriation provided to the Department of Education for said fiscal
year shall be distributed proportionally based on the share of students
enrolled in interdistrict magnet school programs operated by entities
that are (1) not a local or regional board of education, (2) the board of
governors for an independent institution of higher education, as defined
in subsection (a) of section 10a-173 of the general statutes, or the
equivalent of such a board, on behalf of the independent institution of
higher education, or (3) any other third-party, not-for-profit corporation
Public Act No. 26-76 107 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
approved by the Commissioner of Education.
Sec. 100. Section 16 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The following sums from the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by [this act] public act 26-68, to the
Judicial Department, for Youth Services Prevention, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, shall be made available in said fiscal year as
follows:
(1) $75,000 to Dominican American Coalition of Connecticut, Inc.;
(2) $30,000 to Intempo Organization, Inc.;
[(3) $200,000 to My Architecture Workshops, Inc.;]
[(4)] (3) $50,000 to Second Chance Re-entry Initiative Program
(SCRIP); and
[(5)] (4) $55,000 to Tri-Town Youth Services.
(b) The sums released by the Judicial Department pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, that
are not fully expended by the end of said fiscal year shall not lapse and
shall remain available to the recipients identified in subdivisions (1) to
(4), inclusive, of said subsection for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
and each fiscal year thereafter, until such funds are fully expended.
Sec. 101. Section 12-412 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes,
as amended by section 272 of public act 26-68, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
applicable to sales occurring on or after July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (128) [Nonelectronic] Sales of nonelectronic school supplies [,
such as backpacks, lunchboxes, notebooks, pens and pencils, crayons,
Public Act No. 26-76 108 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
rulers and paper] that are purchased for nonbusiness purposes. For
purposes of implementing the provisions of this subdivision, the
Commissioner of Revenue Services shall issue policies and procedures
to (A) identify a list of qualifying school supplies under this subdivision,
and (B) establish criteria to determine when a purchase is made for
business purposes. The commissioner shall post such policies and
procedures on its Internet web site and submit such policies and
procedures to the Secretary of the State for posting on the eRegulations
System at least fifteen days prior to the effective date of any such policy
or procedure.
Sec. 102. Subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of section 457 of public act
26-68 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
from passage):
(3) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, human
services, housing and insurance and real estate, or their designees, who
shall jointly choose the chairpersons of the working group; and
Sec. 103. Section 180 of public act 26-68 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 13b-268 of the general
statutes or any other provision of the general statutes [,] or special act
[or regulation] that prohibits the construction of any new highway
railroad crossing at grade, the Department of Transportation shall allow
the town of Newtown or its authority or agent to construct [an] a public
at-grade [pedestrian] crossing [on] for pedestrians and bicyclists across
the roadway and track of the Stepney Branch of the Housatonic Railroad
[as part of the Housatonic Valley Rail Trail Railroad] at approximately
Milepost 0.0 in the town of Newtown, provided such at-grade
[pedestrian] crossing is (1) approved by the legislative body of the town
Public Act No. 26-76 109 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
of Newtown, [and] the Housatonic Railroad Company and the
Maybrook Railroad Company, and (2) constructed in accordance with
the [department's] recommendations from the Department of
Transportation. The Housatonic Railroad Company and Maybrook
Railroad Company, and their respective successors, shall be deemed an
owner, as defined in section 52-557f of the general statutes, of such
railroad for the purposes of sections 52-557f to 52-557i, inclusive, of the
general statutes.
Sec. 104. (Effective from passage) Up to of $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by public act
26-68, to the Department of Economic and Community Development,
for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Angel
of Edgewood, Inc.
Sec. 105. (Effective from passage) The Legislative Commissioners' Office
shall, in codifying the provisions of this act, make such technical,
grammatical and punctuation changes as are necessary to carry out the
purposes of this act, including, but not limited to, correcting inaccurate
internal references.
Sec. 106. Section 29-1ll of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) The Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, in
consultation with the Police Officer Standards and Training Council,
shall establish a project to be known as the social work and law
enforcement project to advance the ethical and effective integration of
social work services into law enforcement units by preparing social
workers, social work students and law enforcement professionals to
collaborate in the field of police social work. The project shall be located
Public Act No. 26-76 110 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
at Southern Connecticut State University. The objectives of the project
shall be to: (1) Educate and train the social work and law enforcement
workforce to collaborate by using a model that integrates police and
social work, (2) increase community wellness through training,
research, education and policy advocacy concerning the integration of
police and social work, (3) strengthen the engagement among social
workers, law enforcement officers and community members, and (4)
promote dialogue concerning diversity, disparities and systemic racism
in criminal and juvenile justice settings. For purposes of this section,
"law enforcement unit" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
294a.
(b) Not later than January 1, [2026] 2027, the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding with Southern Connecticut State
University for an amount not less than eight hundred fifty thousand
dollars for the purpose of establishing, expanding and supporting the
social work and law enforcement project. Such memorandum shall
include, but need not be limited to, a requirement that any use of
funding for the project for a purpose other than providing training or
education to a police officer shall require the commissioner's written
authorization.
Sec. 107. (Effective from passage) Section 252 of public act 26-68 shall
take effect from its passage.
Sec. 108. (Effective from passage) Up to $175,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by public act
26-68, to the Department of Economic and Community Development,
for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Rich Dae
Foundation.
Public Act No. 26-76 111 of 112

Substitute Senate Bill No. 477
Governor's Action:
Approved May 27, 2026
Public Act No. 26-76 112 of 112